“It’s this or fish, and they are sick of fish.” Mama stared at him.
That’s not to say I haven’t been keeping an eye on the cheap lager. Sainsbury’s had a decent offer on Beck’s at £6.99 for a box of 15 but with Easter on it’s way I’m rubbing my hands at the 3 for £20 offers I’m hoping Tesco bring out. What better way to celebrate an important date in the calendar of our Lord and saviour than to mark both Easter and the Royal wedding with a river of cheap lager?
The 2010 restructuring wasn’t enough to make the company profitable again. In court papers, Betsey Johnson Chief Financial Officer Jonathan Friedman, blaming the U.S. recession’s effect on “higher-end fashion apparel brands,” said sales at the company’s retail stores have fallen by more than 20% since 2007 and profitability has declined by more than 50%.
6. Yeah Yeah Yeahs "Gold Lion" 3:05
Oh, yeah...and AFTER ball homework & laundry!
WOOHOO....Open 7 days a week from 10am - 5pm this place is HUGE....747 hanger size....Now granted, ALL the spaces haven't filled as yet but they're filling as I type & filling FAST....!!
July 6th, 2011
Finally, confirmation of something I've always suspected. Conservatives are better able to understand liberal positions than liberals are able to honestly entertain conservative ideas. I would chime in here that the ability to entertain other points of view that one does not agree with is a mark of intelligence, but I won't...
"I'm just a girl who used to write for a magazine to make a living, and now writes a blog to make a life..."
Step 3: Apply more hot glue to the bottom of the folded circle.
3) Due to the heat generated plant pests, diseases and weeds will be killed by this method – great you can bung anything in, particularly good if there are a lot of weeds in your garden……like mine!
Just like any athlete, I’ve always been frustrated by injuries. You come to expect so much from your body that getting hurt pisses you off. But in the past few months it’s been like someone poured boiling water on that feeling: being hurt as a personal trainer sucks. You’ve spent months studying anatomy and movement patterns so you can help others work on their own bodies; but analyzing your own movement properly is nearly impossible, and we all know that strong-willed people don’t want to ask for help when it comes to something so intimate as the alignment of your joints. Cause I’m supposed to know what I’m doing, right!?
And that's when I lost it.
Had the flow of equality in her ethereal vastness
A: This handy chart outlines the levels of NFL membership, and how it figures a school’s “strength,” as well as individual levels of service points that may be awarded:
I haven't given up on this concept. Currently I'm working on projects for an exhibit in August, so I have to set experiments aside and focus. I'll pick up on this again once I have my work done for the exhibit.
Know someone turning 21 and very happy to be of legal age for a nice cold one? Give them a chuckle with this beer card. There's other possible uses for this card - Perhaps a Bachelor Party card or to anyone that loves a good beer. The card is customizable inside, so you can put your own message!
My husband was going to do a photo shoot for me for some publicity photos. For some dumb reason, I decided to color my hair, not the whole thing, just the pesky damn grays that seem to be taking over my head. I went to the store, bought a professional brand that looked harmless enough. Just a ten minute coloring. How bad could this be? The box looked like it would match my color, my unnatural color that is, but no! I get this dark red brown/purple thing going on.
"Are you going to spank me?"
And then, it all made sense.
The gyoza, priced at 6€ for eight pieces, 8€ for twelve pieces and 10€ for sixteen pieces is a bargain. Sides of ponzu laced rice at 2€ and marinated soy salad at 1.50€ are a steal, and beers are priced at 3€ and 4€ is just damn silly (with me in the room, anyway).
It’s a problem courthouse officials say has never happened, and they’re working on making sure it doesn’t happen again.
And writing this blog goes a long way towards reminding me of that every time I am tempted to go for the easier option.
Yet like Dr. West, he has also made his contribution to the world, launching acclaimed social action programs such as missionary hospitals and eye camps, eco-friendly farms and schools, and the Midday Meal program, which feeds more than 260,000 plates of nutritious vegetarian food to underprivileged children daily.
Ekta’s media friendly approach was worth appreciative as she tackled all the media queries with utmost calm and sensible responses. She came across as someone who knows her recipes for success, is well aware of the technicalities. That’s why she has reached that position of high stakes.
The production itself is impeccable. The entire set, a kind of post-apocalyptic shipwreck, is ingeniously animated as if it's an extension of Thiérrée's body. It's a collection of junk - patched, billowing sails, an old gramophone player, a worn velvet curtain on a rail, a square of threadbare carpet - which takes on its own, unpredictable life. The clowning is punctuated by a precise and hilarious sound design.
Today, the home is still impressive in its ability to reflect colonial, federal and Victorian design, all of which were very popular during the period it was built. One unique piece of memorabilia that sits at the back of the house is an old mill stone which was used in one of the early mills of Huntington Harbor from 1752-1930. It was given the to Historical Society in 1951.
Before I'd read twenty pages, I was reminded of two other books. This quote (from page 10) made me think of A Tree Grows in Brooklyn by Betty Smith (1943):
It's what I am,
Here's some bits and pieces of the day - beware, I am in photos for something different...
4x100m relay team of Abbey Bodeker, Hannah Bartlome, Mallory Morris, and Emily Cunningham
Another interesting thing to note is how much more text-heavy the older picture books were than ones published today. A friend who attended a children's writing conference last weekend said the editor who spoke recommended no more than 50 words for a picture book text. I wonder if the push for shorter and shorter texts for pretty much all picture books has contributed to the decline in their sales; as the New York Times noted recently, many parents are pushing their kids to listen to chapter books at earlier and earlier ages. Maybe they would feel less need to do so if they had meaty complex picture books like these old ones available.
It’s something that happens every day, every hour, across the country many times over. It’s done so casually that some people respond without a second thought, and then reciprocate with half-hearted interest. It happens at birthday parties, happy hour, luncheons, business meetings, the grocery store, the gym and even while lying on the table of a chatty masseuse.
He created the heaven and the earth, mountians and the spring flowers and the amazing moments that we get to see or be a part of. Pray with me today that God would open our eyes to see more of His beauty because it is everywhere.
2. Give as much as you take. I can credit social media directly for finding me my last two jobs, for creating at least a dozen of my closest friendships, for uncovering what became some of my favorite social events, and for rewarding me with a variety of awesome prizes and swag. That said, I’ve used it to help others find jobs, locate lost pets, spread the word about charitable events, and much more. The best way to get someone to help you is to first help them.
My special person knows precisely how I feel, and is excited by the prospect. We’ve both had our share of disappointments, but somehow found one another and made a decision (well, seems that decision was made by our hearts, once again, instead of our brains) . And we’re determined to make it work.
The Silverfiddle Solution
I was showing it to my mum and asking her what does she think it is, when my niece of 3 years old shout out "CUPCAKE"! Not that bad on my first attempt at 'baking' a felt cupcake.... haha!
The world imposes its voices, teachings, and propaganda upon each of us. There is so much uncertainty in all of that, as doubts and fears arise. Without doubt this is a tool of Satan as illustrated in the Garden of Eden as seen in Genesis 3:1. “Now the serpent was more subtil than any beast of the field which the Lord God had made. And he said unto the woman, Yea, hath God said, Ye shall not eat of every tree of the garden?” He is sowing seeds of doubt in a most subtle way, not unlike his work today.
Now Ronnie is on top, and he’s raining down some blows from the top. Benji is trying to work out of it, but Ronnie does a good job of staying on the top. And, the round ends with Ronnie on top. Ronnie landed more in the stand up that round and controlled the fight on the ground. I’d give that round to Ronnie.
Really, I think I was just very excited.
But after the children could cook
I enjoy writing these week-end simple posts; while the suggestions are French-inspired, they are easy things that anyone can do here at home in the US.
So, we have arrived back from our vacation to Vegas...and the only thing I can say is "Check me into Gamblers Rehab." Just kidding! However, we did go to Vegas as non-gamblers and we left as gamblers. however, the resort was amazing and I want to go back and never leave the hotel. It was so fabulous that we could actaully do that and be very happy.
Modernisation theory that sees industrialisation, economic progress, prevalent urban residence and the like as preconditions for democratisation is deemed to be irrelevant in the context of political transition for Malaysia.
Date of Origin: Monday May 30th, 2011 approx. 03:15 PM
During the debates he defended himself well enough to earn a vote of confidence from the primary voters, but. in retrospect, he had rather weak competition. From Cain to Perry, Pawlenty to Bachmann, Paul to Santorum, and even Newt Gingrich, the candidates swiftly lost support for a variety of reasons that all come down to the perception that they were not electable.
What I can't understand is how it hasn't been stamped out of children at school. My English teacher would quite possibly have had to take early retirement if she had seen something like that in one of our essays.
Or that one? They are off on their adventure~ having rows added all over the US. :-)
And yet, “The fool says in his heart, ‘There is no God’” (see Psalm 14:1-3). Fools abound. And the defining characteristic of fools is that they aren’t particularly interested in reality.
During club or concert appearances, he never addresses his audience nor announces his selections, generally wears clothing that reflect future fashion trends—Gentleman’s Quarterly named him, “Best Dressed Man” ten years ago—saunters off the band stand or to the rear of the stage when not playing, and occasionally turns his back to the audience while focusing attention on his fellow musicians. “I have been with him on several occasions when he left the stage during a performance,” says Robert Altshuler, Columbia Records’ publicity director, “he either crouches or ambles to the side of the audience and you realize that he is deeply concentrating on everything that his musicians are playing—he is digging his own band, digging it in a the way a Miles Davis fan would. He simply becomes a part of his own audience.”
I love succulents. Cactus especially. So one of my favorite things about my workplace is the AMAZING collection of prickly pear cactus that grows on the "Plaza Level." This time of year, if the recent rains have been adequate, they go nuts with TONS of blooms. Here's a picture from the end of last week:
Here we see the infantry deployments, with Parliament, my command, to the right, and the Royalists under Stef to the left. Note that steff deployed his firelocks in a skirmish screen in front of his army. Just out of shot below where the shot is taken are deployed a Saker each, and below that, we each have a regiment of 12 trotters with a brace of pistols and light armour.
If I could eat anything all the time it would be pie. I love pie. All kinds of pie. Especially fruit pie. And desserts in general. Big fan of sugar.
So, as of yesterday, most of my salt has gone on the snow-covered paths outside my home but I have kept a pinch in reserve for Bob until I hear from him on Friday.
A rose would be my next choice. I have a couple of old fashioned ramblers in the deep red color that are crawling with buds at the moment, and they are very pretty when they pop out. I also have a Knockout in white that stays beautiful from early spring clear up through the early winter snow. My favorite is the yellow rose, and hopefully I can manage one of those this year.
**NOTE: This is what God's sister smells like. AMAZING.
We will not discuss it in this study at this time, but when Haman is humiliated by taking Mordecai through the city of Shushan on horseback later the same day, it is as if Christ is being glorified for the judgment He has brought up the churches of the world. Yes, the Lord Jesus was honored on May 21, 2011 at the completion of the 23 year judgment upon the world’s congregations. God began judging the churches and congregations of the world on May 21, 1988. 23 years later on May 21, 2011 the judgment upon them was complete.
2 shed
So, remember, "When life is heavy and hard to take, go off by yourself. Enter the silence. Bow in prayer. Don’t ask questions: Wait for hope to appear" (Lam. 3:28-29).
Have come to show you go on
I recognised our referee as he arrived in the club car-park and asked him how his pre-season has been going.
Waist:
As you know from earlier, acne can make it difficult to socialize. The negative effects of acne, therefore, can last over the course of a person’s life. The advice contained above should give you a basic understand of what causes acne and how you can treat it to avoid scarring.
We come to a third room "And this will be my room" says Megan. I picture the room she's left behind this morning, the bed piled high with black plastic sacks full of clothes and rubbish. I try to imagine what this room will look like in a month or two, when she's settled in here and forgotten to be tidy.
5 experiment
The ANC has been unable to reverse this strategy since. Their one resounding success was making South Africa ungovernable.
are you ready for a brand new game? (a brand new game)
There is one interview in particular that stands out above the rest. Writer Jerl Surratt tells about how influential Goodman’s poetry was to him when he was growing up in the ‘60s. There is a moment where Surratt begins to quote one of his favorite passages, and is then swept away, reciting the entire poem in what comes off as an impromptu dramatic reading. The words that Goodman wrote are just as powerful as the obvious effect they’ve had on this man, and though it only lasts about twenty seconds, it is one of the most beautiful moments in the film.
- Stephen R. Donaldson
Some plants contain saturated fats, such as coconut, coconut oils, palm oil, palm kernel oil, vegetable oil, and cocoa butter. So just make sure you watch how much of these products you use.
This is what you see through the doors at the main entrance and lobby. Yes. This is the main entrance. I really like the coat hanger thing. It speaks of the old chateau world, of luxury... and winter coats... in the middle of June. And what's behind the coat rack and carved oriental screen?
take my house no one understands the
In my 30s I was having babies so while I know I wore makeup, I sure don't remember putting it on. I barely remember what I was wearing, what I was thinking, or what I was saying during my 30s.
American Psycho was mainly controversial for its use of explicit sex, violence, and twisted psychological subject matter. That means the film is not for everyone as these are all taken to generous extremes, especially in the highly satisfying unrated cut. There are a lot of great sequences in this film because of those elements, none that I will spoil for you, but many are there to reveal the fact that Patrick Bateman tries to emulate certain behaviors. From a pornographic video to The Texas Chain Saw Massacre, he integrates them into his twisted fantasies, but there remains the question – how real are they? The psychological ambiguity of this film is masterful. There is plenty of evidence to support whatever theory you choose, but you have to look at the subtleties to truly grasp all the possible meanings. Did Bateman actually do all these horrendous, violent acts, and the world is just so consumed with greed, self-importance, and indifference that it doesn’t matter? Or is Bateman so far out of his mind that he cannot separate his own sick fantasies from hard reality? Both theories are fascinating to explore, and neither can be entirely discounted. This is not one of those films which presents you all the evidence, and just leaves you blowing in the wind as the credits roll. That’s where Patrick Bateman’s internal monologues come in. They give you a perspective on these things, and allows you to see it all through his eyes. And even at the end, Bateman doesn’t know what to believe, but with that internal voice, an audience gains the only thing that matters – what it all means to Bateman.
The cap helps distinguish Westys. This beer alone has created a black market because of the ultra limited supply/distribution, insane demand, all coupled with the Monk's strict moral code that 'the beer is not to be commercialized.' In order to buy this beer, one must first place an order weeks in advance, travel to the St. Sixtus Abbey's drive up service station - typically waiting in very long lines, and finally are rationed out only a few cases per vehicle. The price of a case (4 six-packs) at the abbey typically run $48 but I have seen a single six pack on eBay run $170. Expensive? Well, yes - but remember, it is typically only the globetrotting millionaire who can afford one bottle of some of the world's best wine, which can start in the upper hundreds, if not thousands of dollars. I've seen friends and family not blink to a bottle of simple Dom Perignon (by the way who was a French monk) for $200+.I traded for the above pictured Westy 12s through BeerAdvocate.com. This is a wonderful way to get beers that you cannot get and to allow others to try local favorites that you are more easily able to acquire.
My drinking experience tells me that bottle-conditioned beers generally have a finer, softer carbonation than force carbonated beers. That's not to say that it's always preferable – I find the supersaturation of CO2 in many Belgian beers a bit hard to deal with, but again, this is a fine, small-bubble type of carbonation, whereas I find force carbonated beers tend to have larger, rougher bubbles. This is my experience, but there's also a bit of science behind it.
Blue Sky Scrubs Lab Coat offers abundant storage for papers, pens, stethoscopes, and whatever else the busy medical and nursing professional may need with a polished look.
downthetubes: The comic industry has gone through many changes since you drew strips like 'Suzette of the Silver Sword' and 'Edward' (for the Dutch magazine Tina). Do you think comics still have a future?
My insides float in warm strawberry jam.
Birds Eye C&W Varieties $0.50/2
Most analysts and commentators still seem to overwhelmingly believe that Apple are likely to continue dominating as market leader with iPad with around 70% share as these competitors come to pass. The PlayBook will try especially to appeal to those corporates that already run Blackberry devices, however the iPad has already become a consumer-led trojan horse in many large global corporations. The PlayBook seems to suffer some power management and browser/scrolling performance issues, the latter apparently common amongst many of the Intel competitors at CES. Many competitors also have too small screen sizes, and the promise of later larger models will worry potential buyers in case the apps each device is trying to build up will not look so great or function well on a different sized screen later.
So far this pregnancy has been a absolute roller-coaster of emotions. We ended up falling pregnant naturally just days before we were due to start IVF. I am so glad because I was really worried about going down the IVF path, although after a year of trying to fall pregnant since Grace died, I was prepared to do anything!
I've done that so many times I cannot count them anymore so I've decided to join in my missionary friends Daniel fast that starts Monday. I seriously need something to kick start me back on that road that leads to success. I would really like to be fifty one pounds lighter by the very first day of September, 2012. The "they sayers" say that you have to set goals, and I'm more of a nay sayer in that area, when it comes to weight droppings. I have successfully set and completed goals in past, I can do this.
Mr. Bigtime and I have gone on 2 different trips with them, one to Louisiana and one to Guatemala. We feel like every time we go on a trip with KATW, it does so much for our soul. It gives us a better appreciation of the live God has given us every time.
But Bloom maintains: "The hospital is a disaster and needs a thorough overhaul.
Mere Descriptiveness: The PTO argued that the words SUGAR and COTTON identify the type of commodity being traded, and the wording NO. 2, NO. 11, and NO. 14 identify the contract numbers that the applicant provides for its future exchanges. Applicant pointed out that investors trade, buy, or sell contracts from each other, according to the established rules set forth by the SUGAR NO. 11, SUGAR NO. 14, and COTTON NO. 2 contract terms.
-- Benjamin Franklin
because this worked really well last year
I also made this kitty:
Where you keep your Rolling Stones records
(Mary’s work is featured in this book from 1999 and the pages still hold timeless applications for today’s homes.)
If you are lucky enough to have awesome friends like Veruca Salt (who packed the boot with fried eggs, crispy bacon, grilled sausages, caramelised onions, soft buns, tomato sauce and barbecue sauce for breakfast) then a rest stop at the Glenbrook Visitor Information Centre provides picnic tables and clean bathrooms before the mountainous ascent.
I am sad to say that I was unable to attend due to prior commitments but I knew that MWR fans would have a great look into the happenings of this historic event thanks to Pro Wrestling expert Patrick Brandmeyer being able to attend as well as MWR Photographer Mike Van Hoogstraat.
I have to believe that she wonders about him to this day, and I pray that she will somehow know that the little boy she carried is safe with a family who finds him a perfect fit.
My own name has been very easy to grow into. It's one of those dead common names that you could find - I bet - anywhere around the English speaking world. There are loads of other writers with the same name, an autism and animal behaviour expert (she does the books with Temple Grandin), a TV and Media lecturer and academic and of course Catherine Johnson, dramatist and writer of Mama Mia. I am not any of them.
Is what it is all about.
Can they still sing? Can they still play? Can they still write songs? Yes. Jim and I went to the Crosby, Stills and Nash concert last night at The Joint at the Hard Rock Hotel here in Las Vegas. (I can tell I'm tired because I already made 4 typos.) They sound fabulous. Graham Nash said they're 70 years old. According to my calculations, this means that if you include the time before they got together, they've been singing and playing for at least 50 years. They performed for over two and a half hours, sang many of their hits and sang some of their new songs. During the second set, we really got a chance to appreciate the beautiful harmony and how well those voices have held up. Plus at the end of the set, they really rocked (as promised by Graham Nash). Stephen Stills is a monster on the guitar!
“All I’m saying is that you owe Helen an apology. If you had any sense at all, you might see that it was probably for the be-”
“….protectionists see the rise of a country like Turkey as an economic threat we must defend against, not as an opportunity to further our prosperity….there are some who fear the growth of a country like Turkey…they seem to think that trade is a sort of zero-sum game. The whole point about trade is that everyone can benefit from it.”
It's lost in talk, I waste my time
It was supposed to be non-partisan. But the recent Barangay and SK elections were practically a party politics. I wrote, Barangay Elections, Non-Partisan?
The BBC interview is here.
some days.
Monkey's Dad, Tom divorced and remarried, c. 1960. (Monkeyrotica was from the 2nd marriage)
I was scared shitless
This was the first time we stayed in the a resort that was really more child focussed than any others we’ve stayed in before. The Anantara Dhigu prepared special kids towels, lots of J&J toiletries, even a Kodomo toothbrush and toothpaste, and a backpack that included a Cars water bottle, a whole set of Faber Castell crayons, a sticker book and some aeroplane model builder. We seemed to be the only Chinese couple there with kids, but there were quite a number of other families with kids as well (a few Japanese), and when I came back I saw that this resort was being advertised as a couple’s paradise, which I think certainly could not be further from the truth because I don’t think I’d really want all these kids running all over the place on my honeymoon or romantic holiday. Anyhow, it’s great that kids are so welcome, with service staff always chatting to the kids, you can feel less embarassed when they’re up to antics or throw their food on the floor.
I picked my favorite Butter Chicken. The chicken being used in the dish was chicken tikka, which was grilled in a skewer. I’m not sure if that’s what it supposed to be used in this dish but i just don’t mind. The chicken was so tender. The sauce was creamy. I dunked the naan to the sauce and even wiped the very last bit off the bowl!!
I am going to try a little harder to update.
So here's to 2012! To throwing the doors wide open and welcoming the change instead of cringing away from it. To spending as much time as possible with friends and family and looking out for each other. To staying strong and standing up for one another. To believing in ourselves and knowing that we deserve better. Not bigger and shinier, but better. Less, more... that sort of thing. Happy Epic New Year everyone :)
Our very own Zizou
Finding work is tough these days…especially for us artsy types! So, as a full time visual artist I’ve learned that you have to be creative not only in your work but in LOOKING for work! You need to expand your ideas of how your services can be utilized in ways you might not have thought of before. That’s why years ago I started designing my own lines of greeting cards and t-shirts as well as designing them for companies and individuals. This lead me to finding other alternative ways my art skills could be useful to new clients. I also design logos and marketing materials which lead to working with some musicians.
A little later the nurse checked me again and I was dilated to 9cm & they wanted to break my water. Earlier when I was only 7 cm the midwife had wanted to break my water as well to speed things up but Dan refused & was insistent that she not. When they again wanted to, we called Dan (who was waiting upstairs in our recovery room) who said to wait some more. Thankfully they let me get on my knees, allowing gravity to help break my water (up to this point I’d only been on my back!). It eventually broke some, but not all the way. The midwife kept saying that if she broke my water it would speed up the process, and eventually after calling Dan again and him coming down to the floor (not into the room), we decided to let them break the rest of my water.
If any of the articles pique an interest or you would like to discuss further, I am always only a phone call or email away or chat with me on the blog.
With now the sound of a single shot snapping like a whip, and now an
Let me frame this story by saying that the Wolf has never been to Cleveland, but he was an instant fan after 2 1/2 hours aboard this cruise.
furthermore, with my iphone I am never alone. I have 614 good friends on Facebook. I can confess my dirtiest, most shameful secrets to them. I can cry on their soft yet firm shoulders. I can call them on desperate nights and purge my insanity with the help of the radioactive waves my beautiful, sleek iphone produces.
Tina Fey rocking a peplum! Heck, Tina Fey rocking her entire look. Apparently Carolina Herrera opted to dress only one star for the night, and she chose Tina. That makes me warm and fuzzy on the inside, because she totally could've chosen somebody more inherently glam, but instead went with the quirky fun girl. Two thumbs up for everybody involved.
Review: Can we just say--book that satisfied my teen angst plus reality-tv-in-a-book desire? Yep, I really enjoyed this quick read. In fact, I kind of smiled at the end, even though it had a characteristic cheesy and predictable ending. Yes, Beatrice is a "thick" girl--*cough, cough* not really. Honestly, Beatrice is a girl who had a messy break up and eats like a normal girl. However, we all know that "plus size" models probably have a different standard than other plus-size gals, right?
16 - clovers - crawlin
I thought it might be nice for the members to contribute to this upcoming issue, and sent out a notice for members to submit memories they have of the High Holidays (Rosh Hashanah, Yom Kippur, Sukkot, Simchat Torah) they experienced while growing up.
Da da da daan da, fresh fare.
“I don’t think we’re underdogs by any means,” he said. “Miami has more recognition, honestly, with their big three guys, but I think we’re a good team as well.”
15And another angel came out of the temple, crying with a loud voice to him that sat on the cloud, Thrust in thy sickle, and reap: for the time is come for thee to reap; for the harvest of the earth is ripe.
for supper we had venison - totally not due to the incident of this morning (i.e. Not the same deer) but it was more delicious due to the revenge....
Anything other than a query: Don’t email and ask us how to query. That’s what Google is for. That’s what submissions guidelines are for. That’s what agent websites and blogs and query help blogs are for. Use them. Queries inboxes are for queries.
“To talk,” Lisa said. When Bitch tried to move around to her left, Lisa shifted her position to stay in her way. I sat up, used my legs and hands to put some distance between Bitch and I.
Starting tonight through Sunday afternoon, The Gingerbread Players will be presenting "Willy Wonka", under the direction of Patty Hughes. This promises to be a wonderful family event that will delight not only the young, yet the young at heart as well.
Last spring Sam Fiorella was recruited for a VP position at a large Toronto marketing agency. With 15 years of experience consulting for major brands like AOL, Ford, and Kraft, Fiorella felt confident in his qualifications. But midway through the interview, he was caught off guard when his interviewer asked him for his Klout score. Fiorella hesitated awkwardly before confessing that he had no idea what a Klout score was.
A sex scene is pornography if the participants fail to communicate, and/or fail to advance the plot AND the story at a well-paced scene length and the activity does not lead to a definitive resolution of the initial conflict.
_____Wish some people would stop being useless and start being beer. (funny beer quote)
It’s a song of heartbreak and angst and that is perfectly depicted;from the wailing guitars, intense drums and finally Dunn’s vocals bringing together what is probably their strongest song yet. It’s not for the light-hearted and as a fan, it is refreshing to hear a mix of screaming and clean vocals.
I read an interesting article last summer in Time Magazine called The Science of Optimism. Let me give you the quick version. Our memories stink. The reason being that we are not storing memories to recall like bookmarks in your browser. Rather, our memories of past event are stored and sometimes modified so that we can construct visions of our future. A person with a damaged hippocampus will have difficulty storing memories AND will have trouble describing future events.
I like that the woods in the back feel really natural and a little out of control (wild roses, honey suckle, clematis, black berries & a ton of other things spill out the edges of it into our grass) but I've always imagined that one day it would be a tad more manicured & purposeful...
“hi just wanted to let you all know first, i won’t be doing Hair in Germany – now the UK tour is cancelled as there are things in the pipeline that i need to concentrate on now – and it’s just not possible to do both. all very sad was so looking forward to the show! wish all the cast luck in Munich.. more news as we have it. be in touch soon x
I wouldn’t say it was much, actually. So far all I’ve been doing is jotting down simple descriptions of the characters that have appeared in my two NaNo stories – what they look like (in my head, anyway), what they wear, their connections with other characters and whatnot – but it’s something. I’ve been setting aside two pages per character, even if I don’t fill those. That way, if I get any more ideas for a particular one, I have room to scribble it down.
It is a real community with bloggers supporting each other which differs to the cut throat world of business where it seems there is always someone copying you or undercutting your charges! We had some lovely samples to give away including some beautiful soy wax melts from Toeknuckles – what a great business name you will never forget it! The Craichouse Comedy Club gave all the blogger a free double pass to try out this fantastic night of entertainment.
Archetype - Morningstar (applied to inner corner/V with MAC 228 by patting)
Will you be my beta reader?
On the day the dessert is made, the taste is something like a brownie that you spent WAY too much time making. But on the second day?
His phone. He found in on the bedside locker. Hers was the last number he had dialled, he hit the redial button, almost convinced there would be no answer.
I have a broken smile, have for years now and as I get older, my teeth get worse. My mom said I inherited my father’s teeth and he got dentures years ago when Zak was a baby. I have several cracked or broken teeth that I’ve had to work around with eating, and smiling of course.
“That’s a very human solution to the problem,” I remarked. “We gorillas prefer less messy methods of removing unwanted guests.”
Becky says: ‘We’d been chatting for a few months and sent sexual messages to each other a few times so, although it seems so stupid now, real sex seemed like the obvious next step. But my first thought when I saw him was: “Oh God, he looks nothing like his picture.” He wasn’t attractive and looked more like 40. But, still, we went straight to the hotel and had sex. I recall feeling nervous, but it was over quickly. ‘Afterwards, he paid for the room and we said goodbye at the station.
For this week, you will be choosing the spiritual exercise. Select one from Creating a Life with God (by Daniel Wolpert) that you haven’t practiced yet. Consult the appendix of that book for detailed suggestions on the exercise. Practice it at least twice this week, then reflect on the experience in your journal entry (minimum 400 words).
Ultimately, if we treat a greater percentage of all things in our lives as sacred, our ideology then moves towards protecting all our interests regardless of compensation or material gain. Much of this has to do with mass consciousness and how we counter corruption within.
I ripped the notice down and used it to wipe the sand from
Gremlin: California Wii?
This morning, my second of three days away from work, I sat in a chair on the patio behind my house. There were about a million birds singing—all a different song, but all perfectly intelligible to someone or at least to another bird. The songs were wonderful even though they were not being sung to or for me. Maybe the birds would be offended if they thought I was listening in on their conversations and songs.
The right to data portability seems to be focused on a competition law objective, reducing switching costs between service providers, rather than a data protection objective. It therefore exceeds the scope of Article 16 TFEU on which the proposed Regulation is based.
It was Marge who first tried to infect me with the HIV virus, and a few years later my best junk buddy John. How many others would also have tried to pass on their bad blood if they ever had the chance I dread to imagine, though not many ever had that chance. After wizening to this trick the first time I became something of a junkie recluse, only mixing with other addicts when I needed to, and only on very rare occasions fixing in the same room or toilet.
Currently, I have very few friends. I think that comes from 13 years of life with a man who didn't like people, so we didn't interact with others very well. I am starting to make friends again, but at this stage in my life, I am finding it very hard to completely accept all my friends' idiosyncrasies.
In the lifestyle, or just curious about it?
Jape – Floating – The Monkeys in the Zoo have More Fun Than Me (2004)
God desired that we possess a knowledge of his will, that we be informed-which is the antithesis of ignorance. Paul said; God wills that all “come unto the knowledge of the truth” (1 Tim. 2:4). “That ye might be filled with the knowledge of his will,” was Paul’s desire for the Colossians (Col. 1: 9).
Punch the dough and set it rise again.
or creep entirely
From my last post, you would have seen some skeins of yarn that I have spun and plied on my truly remarkable CD spindle. The skeins were all wound on my wooden blocker, and are all the same size. They are just hanging there awaiting the next step in the processing.
You see, it’s very important to be a young and solid currency. Why be old and fragile when you can be young and solid? Was not the Reichsmark young and solid when it suffered 8million percent inflation in 1924…and did it not prevail? Indeed it did – with a minor change of Government – until 1945. At which point scarcely a building was left standing in Germany. The genius formerly in charge of controlling the French economy added:
I need to be like Joshua… waiting patiently and faithfully on God. And then, just then, I’ll shine just right exactly when He needs for us to for the campus to flourish for His glory.
Millions will gather today, in India and around the world, to offer prayers, worship, and devotional songs glorifying the appearance of the Divine mother, Radha (Radharani). Radha descended from the spiritual realm shortly after Krishna, approximately 5,000 years ago. She took birth in the small village known as Barsana, which is about 28 miles from Mathura, the birth place of Krishna.
Advise, proactively, on how to avoid disputes and litigation, and on alternative methods of dispute resolution, as well as assist in dispute resolution, including negotiating settlements.
So, Kingmaker - I had a real soft spot for them and saw them many times. First seen supporting The Wonder Stuff and subsequently seen both headlining and supporting others. Another three piece band that sounded like more than the sum of their parts, they made some cracking singles and were ace live. I believe Loz Hardy deputised for a poorly Malc Treece in the Wonder Stuff on at least one occasion and also co-wrote material for Elastica.
As we take that walk along the beach,we see people who are exercising, walking dogs,having a swim or just enjoying each other after a long day. A long day of footprints. What do we really know about the story of those left? Are they walking alone in their journey or allowing trusted friends and family to help carry the load for a while. To make repairs to damaged foundations, so that they can rest and gain strength to carry the load. To continue the journey with their help or to move on alone. Leaving that single set of prints in the sand.
(It was a tad disconcerting that he and his servant Grumio - not to be confused with Bianca's suitor Gremio - were both Irish, especially since Petruchio mentions frequently that he is from Verona. A little known colony in the 1940s in Italy, where this production is set? Ah well, what the hell? They're both Catholic countries, aren't they, as the programme points out?)
Just for Today: I am but one person in the entire scheme of things. I humbly accept my place in the big picture.
I have huge plans for the next year or so. It will be a lot of work bringing games, animations and a movie some time soon. All stuff in the works, I'll get more info to you soon enough. For now it's just busy busy busy, but all work and no play makes Jack a dull boy.....
One of my clients - well, the international arm of that client, were at the fair and we walked around together. What a great feeling it was to meet and greet and see MY books (well, my client's books) out there being hawked and discussed. So nice to see them at the fair and doing well. The clients are fun too, so being with them was just a nice experience.
Level 26: Mastery: +68%, Weapon ATT: +26, Minimum Critical Damage: +13%.
Frank marries Eva, which draws a huge crowd. However, Trupo pulls over their car as they leave the ceremony and tells Frank "You know, a man who walks around in a $50,000.00 chinchilla coat and never even bought me a cup of coffee, there's something wrong there. Pay your bills, Frank." Frank tells him he pays off the cops, but Trupo tells him he's "Special Investigations" because he's special. He tells Frank to pay him Ten Grand every month and lets them go. Frank goes home and burns the chinchilla coat
There is definitely transmission from others and it cannot be dismissed and it is universal. This faith expressed in different languages and culture that everyOne has whatever the tradition needs to be honored respected and cannot be argued with. Yet these cultural identities only create fear and separation paradoxically and humanity has not even yet matured into seeing we are all the same despite wild and interesting differences. Argument never wins. The only thing to do, I find, is to give the faithful Yoga and then that takes them Somewhere beyond cultism.
4. Stamp sentiment label, color in "rock", sponge edges with red and yellow inks, glaze all black areas with Sakura Glaze Pen.
The clear tenor of this provision is that there was to be only one meeting of Congress at which the President was to give an account of his trusteeship. The section did not say each meeting, which it could very well have said if that had been the intention. If the National Assembly did not think that the report in section 3 was to be the first and last Congress Act No. 671 would lapsed, what reason could there be for its failure to provide in appropriate and clear terms for the filing of subsequent reports? Such reports, if the President was expected to continue making laws in the forms of rules, regulations and executive orders, were as important, of as unimportant, as the initial one.
Then I'm out of the forest, and fuck, it's taken ages and I only have one piece of the hammer. I can't be arsed going back around again!
Evolution is the progressive change of genetics within a species. Often the changes are so small that we do not observe them. Such is the case with large organisms, like humans, whose time between generations is very long (remember humans have a life expectancy ~75 yrs or so). We can see the progressive change of genetics in species that have much smaller generations, like bacteria or weeds. (Bacterial generations can be completed in as little as 30 minutes depending on the species, but most bacterial species will have a new generation within 24 hrs. Weeds/plants are a little longer, in the "weeks" category, but still short enough for human observation.)
Time to the sacred trust of thy mind, Kafka!
Run a thin line of hot glue along the edge of a mirror's backside, then align it to the outside edge of your base mirror. You have to move fast because the glue dries quickly. If that happens, just peel it off and start again. Then hold the mirror in place for a few seconds until it sets. Repeat this for all four side mirrors, and add a little glue at the inside corner seams if you feel it needs more stability.
It is terribly sad that this week has ended with the callous murder of Police Constable Ronan Kerr. Our thoughts and prayers are with his family and friends. It reminds us all how some sections of Northern Ireland society, despite the obvious progress that has been made, still remains capable of the most inexpicable attitudes and most cruel crimes. Listening this evening to this young man's mother describe her pride in her son, and appeal to others not to be deterred from joining the police, was particularly moving.
“I don’t think your friend got the Bryan Adams song reference. Nice to know I fell in love with a musician in Mexico.”
Whaley is being held without bail in the Polk County Jail.
It was breathtaking! The colors were overwhelming. I found this on my memory stick, I do not think it is the best shot, but it captures that magical sunrise all the same.
Swinimer intends to be there, reportedly planning to wear his favourite shirt.
Of course this has important implications. Thanks to our poor education system and constant media 'entertainment', we have a populace that is largely ignorant about important matters and thus if a newspaper columnist in The Sun states that, for example, immigration is vital to the economy, it is likely to be accepted as fact by his readership. After all, the author has presumably been employed because he knows about these things.
1/4 c sugar
No crying He makes
BRISTOL: Here. (She bounces it back.)
5. Be inventive
Sun, 11pm: That was more depressing than I bargained for. Sigh. Not exactly the high note I was looking to end the weekend on.
on December 24th or 25th?
There will be transport from all over South Wales to Barking for the demonstration (and from other areas of the country no doubt) for more information leave a comment on the blog and we can take it for there. YFJ Says:
Scroll down to the bottom of the post if all you want is pictures!! Professional shots are always by Molly McGannon. : )
Well, that might be a bit dramatic, but that's kind of how I feel right now.
IT. WAS. PERFECT.
Track 11 - Main Title ( Amanda By Night )
Equipment Needed:
1 c. skim milk
Our people, our territories and our futures are not for sale and I am not willing to trade my inherent rights for ANY organization. AFN has a choice - it has to be relevant to First Nations or it will fade into oblivion like CAP did.
And so this morning, he was not up to par. I think it has more to do with the fact that for the past week, every day brought some new improvement. I, at least, had it in my head that Xander would make these kinds of steps forward every day and we’d be getting him home in days rather than weeks. I know that’s unrealistic, but I hoped, you know? And seeing him just keep to the status quo for a little while, not even taking a step back, is a little disheartening. Kirsten, the nurse, explained that he looked fine, that his numbers were totally normal, but add this to the rest of the last two weeks, to the fact that May hasn’t slept well in months, and
At least two people were killed after around 5,000 far-right football fans and nationalists gathered at a rally outside Red Square at the weekend, calling for the death of Russia's immigrant population.
1. One (1) layout entry per person.
The week between was always a good time for me.
Here is part two in my series on Grace. This sermon is from Luke 6:27-36. Thanks for stopping by. jerry
So now on to the last challenge....
As you might imagine, with volcanoes come earthquakes and, Arequipa has had its fair share. The most recent being a huge quake in 2001 that rattled the area for over a minute, killing scores and toppling one of the cathedral’s steeples – which has been nicely repaired, as you can see.
so it is very peaceful.
But then, eight year old kids are precisely who this beer is aimed at, as is made clear by the child-sized bottles it's sold in. (This is not a problem unique to this brewery, because like always, those who are scared tend to follow the bully...)
If you haven’t tried naming my Muse, you have two more weeks! Thanks to all who have guessed. Here’s a hint for those who have tried: Forget gender; one word. Now try again! There could be a little prize involved. Har-har!
The filling was more or less made up on the spot; Granny Smith apples, brown sugar, ground cinnamon, nutmeg & ginger, a pinch of salt & some lemon juice.
Apart from the usual lots of lovely furniture, china, silver and jewelry there were also massive collections of butterflies pinned on to board and stored in cabinets, shells (hundreds of them) and - most horrific of all - a room full of stuffed animal heads. There were tiger and leopard rugs and then dozens of stuffed heads - who would wish to buy such things?
I told them about how it all made me feel, about how it made me feel suicidal and about how I used to cut myself. I had felt really good yesterday until they started trying to convince me I was wrong. After that talk, I seriously thought about finding my safety pins again. They’re going to send me to therapy, for the depression, and for the “gender confusion” I’m going through. They said that my being bisexual and transgender was just me being full of shit, and that my cutting myself was cowardly when all it was was me trying to relieve some of the pressure I was feeling.
I am pretty opposed to marriage right now because of the way society and government has gone with divorce courts, feminism, public schools, high taxes, etc. But even if marriage seems irrational now, I still think that offers of casual sex should be rejected. I can still make friends with Christian women and treat them nicely. Maybe something will change… lower taxes, school choice, marriage penalty abolished, shared parenting, charter marriages, etc., and then marriage will make sense again. Right now, it just seems like there are too many policies that make it irrational.
Happy Sunday All!
Anyways...enough rambling. This post is small. It's just about a present that I made for a friend's birthday. I received a Cricut Expression for Christmas this year. As a future teacher (and a girl who just loves to scrapook and craft anyway) my Mom thought it would be the best present ever. And it is!! I LOVE that thing. I'm still getting used to it and I have to admit I still haven't figured out how to get it to preview what it's going to cut before it actually starts cutting...but I'm learning.
words you will be justified, and by your words you will be condemned.”
During May, any of this stuff goes unsewn it gets given.
There are two stages to this campaign:
This almost took my Most Pleasant Surprise award but was pipped at the post by Rage. Looking very much like Vanquish, Binary Domain features a nice bit of squad interplay in that you can issue commands but also have conversations based on which members you included in your squad. Fast and loose shooting is the name of the game in this title and you’ll be ripping through evil robots on the way to, what I expect will be one of many, boss battles. Definitely one to watch out for if you liked Vanquish.
there is that 'twinge' in the air that signals the upcoming fall coolness
SOBDI Blog (sobdiblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
whose voice is oracular and portentous,
Today's pictures don't really make me feel any less frumpy as they were taken by my 7 year old, who insisted I post them. They are a little more random then I was looking for and way more fuzzy:)
Embarrassment.
Omg, lol... good for you! Did the mods delete it? Did anyone have time to respond? Do you feel better? :)
my first time with cheese cake and not baked this time around.....
Tuesday, the 13th of April, 2010 – What a date!, definitely a day to remember. Why is that? you may ask; well, I had a surprise thank you party thrown for me with 40 of my favourite colleagues in Victoria. Interior Designer Michelle Matte and Artist John Wolfe from Wolf Decorative Finishes coordinated and put together a stunning surprise party at Veneto for me to say thank you for my support to our local design community. The place was beautifully decorated by Tara McHugh Flora, Tara was one of the first members of Meade Design Group when I started and now she is a very successful fleur couturier and in my opinion one of the best in the city. I couldn’t believe there were more than 40 colleagues there to say thank you – I said my pleasure, but now I have to say once again - Thank you!! for making me feel so appreciated.
April 12, 1861, 3:20 a.m.
The subject of today’s analysis is Wolfmother’s self-titled album (why the F--- no, I’m not going through that rant again), which, frankly, I fucking hated at first. How I had the will to listen to it even after I almost set my house on fire is beyond my reckoning. But after a while, it grew on me. And I mean, IT GREW, man, like my grandmother’s plants after a hellish summer. That’s also when I realized that I was taking it too seriously and I fucking hated myself for this.
Zhu Hai City is about two hours from Guangzhou. David is such a good guide. He points out all the places of interest. The universities and convention sites. He has been to Zhu Hai City 10 times. It is one of his favorite places to visit. The drive along the sea is beautiful. I can't imagine how pretty in the summer sun. There are sidewalks along most of the seaside in the city so you could walk forever. How lovely.
A new plan was drawn up which removed the unwanted lawn areas. A gorgeous view of Mount Hood was to be retained and enhanced. The poor access to the sloping areas was improved by installing several natural stone steps and gravel pathways. This created a stroll garden with large stone boulders as seating along the pathway. These paths snake throughout the back yard and connect the lower access points to the pavers on the upper level and access ways to the residence. As one of the owners is from Southeast Asia, stepping stones were custom engraved with Chinese symbols accompanied by their English translations.
Convicted in the August 1996 robbery murder of a friend, Bartee was given a stay before his scheduled execution in February so that additional DNA testing could be done. When the May 2 date was announced, Bartee attorney David Dow sent the court a letter saying the new date should not have been set because DNA testing has not been done. Dow said no notice of a hearing for a new execution date was sent to him or Bartee.
Braving the rotary is my specialty. Even tractor trailers flee at the sight of my pumpkin orange Ford Focus. As I whipped past one of those early tourists and zipped into my favorite parking spot among squawking horns and swearing drivers, I looked over at Marlene and smiled. Who says senior citizens can’t drive?
Oh, and the emails don't mention the commissions.
Randomness: Today was my dad's b-day, I ate too much cake. It was super rich and I seriously wish i could cut it out of my stomach to stop the pain!! I would have added a photo of the evil bake good...but I fear this post contains way too many pictures already. That, and the mere sight of said cake makes my unsettled tummy churn....
Reality is mostly illusion.
The torn tights and bruised knees didn’t spell quite the same damage as the time I wore my grandmother’s mink stole. ”Is that real fur?” enquired a guest at the bijou drinks do. “Was,” I retorted apologetically. Let’s just say the spirit of Christmas, much like my furry accessory, was not alive that night. Had I stayed at home in my fleece pyjamas watching George Michael warble to ‘Last Christmas’, I would have fared better. At least the house has an alarm.
QVC Japan achieved growth of 16 percent in units sold for the quarter with the average selling price in local currency declining 10 percent. QVC Japan’s adjusted OIBDA in local currency increased 3 percent and the adjusted OIBDA margin declined 51 basis points due to increased marketing expense primarily related to the naming rights to QVC Marine Field baseball stadium.
On going to bed that night, Joseph began thinking about Zuleikha and couldn’t stop thinking about her, and he couldn’t sleep.
Over his career, Rick Springfield has placed 17 hits in the Billboard Top-40 Charts.
So my sister might be a mum in time for Mother’s Day. It’s almost time.
The emphasis on extent, as distinct from the existence of the liquidity difficulties, is crucial. The way that statement to Parliament is crafted, it is possible to have been aware of the existence of the liquidity problems and still claim to have been ignorant of the extent of those problems. In my view, Nunez-Tesheira’s choice of words is artful, since she is already on the record as to her motivations in ensuring that her family monies were withdrawn from CIB when she learned of the financial problems there.
Upon entering, the first thing you notice is that the floor seems tilted–the result of Freeman’s distinctively oblique intonation. His sour off-center tone–which occasionally prompts charges that he plays out of tune–invests the best of his performances with a hard-edged emotional intensity. When he played Charlie Parker’s “Confirmation” on a recent weekend at the Jazz Showcase, where he led a fine quintet (Brad Goode on trumpet; Joan Hickey on piano; Mendai on bass; Robert Shy on drums one night and Michael Raynor on drums the other), he bristled with energy but also sounded wounded. And when he played the ballad “Lover Man,” he conjured up a world that was unremittingly bleak.
My thoughts on drugs are that some are okay and fairly harmless (as for as drugs go) but others seem really nasty, addictive, and possibly life ruining. I guess you could say the same thing about alcohol, it could ruin your life, but if you moderate yourself and know what you're doing, it probably won't. My parents never really gave us (me and my bro) a talk about drugs, we more have open conversations sometimes, but it's not a big topic around here. I have basic drug knowledge, I actually ended up learning about drugs when a friend nearly killed herself by drug use, so I have a rather bitter attitude towards them, and seriously doubt that I'll ever try any.
Selecting typesizes depends on the context of your work and your audience. If you are designing for people in their 20s and 30s, you’d expect them to have better vision than an audience who are your grandparent’s age. And you would be smart to use a larger typesize for the older group. All common sense really.
Here’s the intro from the first season of the TV show. This is a blast from the past.
It’s always full of surprises. Nice surprises, but hardly missed garments.
I met Michael, had a bit of a lighthearted argument with him but that didn't stop him from coming over and cuddling up with me for a picture when someones camera was taking too long. I think he wanted me. You know, in the Biblical sense. That's what I'm going with anyway. Makes for a more fun daydream!
Dollar General exists to make cheap products available to everyone. It’s a very profitable business. The question with which we must wrestle is this: Is Dollar General a good model for the church to follow? We have been challenged to be more like McDonald’s and Wal-Mart in the past, why not Dollar General now? Perhaps I am making a mountain out of a molehill, but I honestly believe that discipleship requires a higher level of commitment than just joining a church. My greatest fear is that if we cheapen life in Christ as a disciple, we are in danger of bankrupting the faith.
7) How does one go about buying a cemetery for investment purposes?
At first, yes. Caucasian journalist Ben Fulford was a White Dragon/White Hat spokesperson; however, on Dec. 13, 2011, he was “detained” by a certain agency with cabal ties and replaced by either a lookalike agent or possibly a programmed clone. One need only look closely at pre-2011 photos of him and how he looks now and one can see…this is not exactly the same person:
So I started brainstorming with the help of the Better Homes and Gardens Arrange-a-Room tool. I figured by starting there J wouldn't have to move the furniture around quite as much. Here's what the room was like when we started -
Here are some examples of my student’s work:
note: before you freak out about how old they look, keep in mind that they were all in their twenties when scream was made in 1996. fifteen years and unfortunate careers don’t make for a great red carpet showing. don’t worry guys, i still love you, even if your exes don’t.
About Melvin Sparks
We do have someone who will come and do the guttering, we have all the parts needed, and I just want to get it done!
go about the business of their day;
I’ve always been a fan of going out there and shaking it. But I never took classes. I was one of “those girls” out on the floor. Barely any rhythm, no sense of decency. I’m not proud of those days, but I own it.
This was also the weekend for the Harrogate Flower Show. Whilst a bit of mud never hurt anyone, I went on the Thursday and you needed your wellies. By Sunday I imagine even pigs would have been calling for their sties to be on stilts. Luckily I managed to dodge the worst of the showers and pretty much see everything the flower show had to offer.
On Friday, September 16, Rush Limbaugh said that if the Democratic establishment want to get rid of Obama, they must appeal to his ego and convince him to go on his own. Rush has read Obama’s ego perfectly, and here is roughly how it could be handled.
Well it was quite a morning. The first part of this post is a side of me I don't like but I acknowledge...We were sitting in the waiting room at the childrens hospital where the maternal fetal center is located. Sitting there with my husband surrounded by a bunch of ghetto obese under-educated people. I felt so out of place and hated myself for judging these people...but their babies are alive and mine isn't and the unfairness of it hits me like a ton of bricks. A woman was speaking to another woman about how she had one miscarriage previously and was currently12 weeks pregnant and farther along than she had gotten last time. She said: "I will feel so much better after I see that heartbeat" Ugh...I started to quietly cry. I wanted to run away. The heart beat THE HEART BEAT! That is all I wanted to see and hear too. She just has no idea...I felt like my asshole self judging these women and families is what caused my baby to die but...alas I know that it just isn't true. AND I am just way less kind than I used to be. I know that this experience should have turned me into a Mother Teressa type or made me love all mankind, but it didn't. Maybe that will come later. Maybe...Maybe Not.
It is impossible to remove any item from Mr5's room while he is on the premises. He shows a marked tendency toward the Family Hoarding gene, and clings like a barnacle to anything - and I do mean anything - that I might decide is surplus to needs. He LOVES those chocolate wrappers and is "collecting them to make Mr8 an Invisibility cloak". He NEEDS that wooden train set, despite not having looked at it for three years.
didn’t care if i muddled him, ruin his image he hugged me, loved me covered me
Mains d’Oeuvres
Speaking of the A-to-Z Challenge, you're probably seeing a lot about the new Word CAPTCHA system Blogger has begun using. By CAPTCHA, I mean the word verification you have to do in order to make a post on some blogs. The problem is that the new CAPTCHA can be very hard to read, especially for those of us with eye issues (for instance, macular degeneration, which I have...don't go check my avatar again, I'm only in my 30's--it was a freak incident with a really bad bout of the flu). It's not just us freaks, though, the words are hard to read.
It's a rainy Wednesday evening and I've just finished another afternoon of exploration. Wax, paper, paint, overly covered surface! Actually when I looked at the mess I'd created, I rather liked it in it's raw form - it was everything I love all piled on top of each other and then piled on top of each other again!! What a luxury to be so indulgent with these materials - my fave paint colors, slap dash, my favorite collage bits, gorgeous muslin that had been painted and waxed and frayed - not a clear path in sight to what it may become. I eat an apple while I look at the hot mess in front of me - hmmmmmmm - I finished the apple and picked up my chisel and started scraping right smack dab in the center - hunks of the pile start peeling off - there goes my fav collage bits now covered with more wax and new paint, the muslin pieces rip off but leave bits of themselves embedded - wax is remelted and scraped off into the wax pot again - there is now a gorgeous under painting and everything that came off will be used again - the panel is scored, scraped, left with bits of paper and muslin - I worked for about two more hours to resolve it. The photo below is the finished work. I love the cool colors on top of the warm ones underneath.
Huzzah! What a discovery. Now, instead of this being the "dreaded" text, it is the text that I'm eager to tackle because of how useful it could be. It will not be easy; it's a dense 450+ page book with about 180 pages of notes. But at least, now, I feel like I've got a shot at it.
That being said, I don't think I'll have anything new to upload until Monday when the JustRite Christmas Blog Hop will be happening!!! There are going to be SIX Christmas sets revealed in a variety of sizes and not just by the Design Team - we have another 22 friends joining us in this huge event!!!! So don't forget to stop on by on Monday 8am US EST (10pm Australian EST) and see all the goodies the girls have lined up for you!!!
This week's TSG challenge is perfect for those of you that are still working on wrapping those gifts! The challenge is to create a last minute gift tag! For my gift tag I opted to use one of our TSG(Again) stamp sets that are being featured this week by the DT called Loads Of Fun. This set is so much fun to use and I love that I have an excuse to break it out and ink it up!
A phone call the other day has landed me a venue to exhibit art work for the Art Walk in Hays, August 27th, 2010. Since the date is so close, this is a premiere location, my guess who ever they had lined up, had to cancel.
I picked up the first book in this series hoping that I could get Noah remotely interested in a chapter or two before bed. The first night we snuggled together in his comfy chair and read 20 pages - amazing! - but did he remember what we read? That was the question. So the next morning I quizzed him a bit, and, to my amazement, he remembered quite a bit. Even more astonishing, he asked me to sit and read him more - so back to the comfy chair for another - wait for it, wait for it - 65 PAGES OF READING! I am stoked. We ended up finishing the book in about 3 sittings over the course of 2 days. A MAJOR achievement with Little Man. And to my continued surprise he remembered a lot of what we'd read (Little Man sometimes spaces out during reading and it hinders his comprehension.).
Back to the example of Lake Erie, look at what it did to this lighthouse in Cleveland Harbor a few winters ago.
I know it's the 4th of July Holiday this weekend but I couldn't resist these beautiful apricots in my local farm market. They were calling me! And I just had to respond. So no blueberry strawberry- red, white and blue kind of dessert this hoilday. Nope. Just a delicious fresh apricot upside down cake. Which, by the way, is so so good!
This is one tough story, but it cracks open fresh like a newly laid egg when read with an eye for classic Catholic imagery which surrounded Flannery O’Connor and which, as a devout Catholic, inhabited her soul.
All of the pieces came together perfectly, and in very little time and now I have a new table for flea market finds, etc.
Another challenge where I have learned something. I love the world of scrapbooking and card making as I seem to learn something new every day.
Chad was at church early to help with set up/video so I was flying solo.
My blisters feel a little better, but my calves, quads, glutes and low back are tightening up, and my right wrist hurts.
Rich dark color and unique individual beads are the hallmarks of this sweet caviar with a mild finish
They're out to get you get you get you get you get you get you get you
A compulsory licence is an authorization granted by the government in accordance with the grounds described under section 84 of the Indian Patent Act, 1970.
Licensing
For me I find my writing is much more strongly affected by the emotions that music drives me towards rather than those upon which the musical choice was based. And while this may not affect my non-fiction writing (including this blog – although, yes, I am dancing right now in my recliner while writing this, because I am that awesome), it certainly influences my fictional writing, to the point that sometimes my story changes as a result. Suddenly a happy ending can turn into a bittersweet ending if I’m listening to, say, Pink Floyd, while The Beatles can bring a character out of the depths of despair, and The Flaming Lips can just send everything into chaos, and so on and so forth.
The mind may have new and different experiences and perceptions. We may feel our minds expanding or ascending. Light or sound vibrations may come into the mind. New insights may arise or a new creativity may dawn. There may be hints of extrasensory perception or telepathy, or a sense of what will happen to us or to the world tomorrow.
Ink: Canon MX850 printer
One could look at police involvement in the operation of various parts of the Mental Health Act in cost terms. In fact, I know forces have done this to establish how they should cut them. They (mis)-read the Code of Practice to the Mental Health Act and said in fairly blunt terms, “We have no obligation to do X or Y or Z, so we won’t because it will save money.” Cue: unexpected consequences both in terms of NHS reaction, public or patient reaction and other unpredicted problems of ‘failure demand’ which meant things took even longer and resulted in operating tensions, complaints and legal actions, etc.. Costs went up.
It’s here where I feel like the angel, because for once I’m watching over
Lee Dickson, beer manager at Brick Store Pub in Decatur, helped set up the tasting, served as steward and made sure we didn’t have a clue what we were sampling, except for the style. In other words, though we knew the category —- 14B, American IPA, as defined by the Beer Judge Certification Program —- Dickson did not reveal the identities of the 16 beers until after we had chosen a winner.
A nerd was walking down the sidewalk one day when his friend, another nerd, rode up on an incredible shiny new bicycle.
Acts 2 – The Holy Spirit comes at Penticost
We're All Dying to Live expands upon the electropop revelation of Aucoin's 2010 Public Publication EP by placing that release's four songs within the context of a classic concept album, painstakingly spliced together to serve as the soundtrack to a video composed of segments from forty different public domain films. The core of the album lies in seven songs spread out over twenty-two tracks, introduced by an overture and held together by interstitial instrumentals that range from breakbeat battles to ambient soundscapes. By Aucoin's measure, roughly 500 musicians from all over Canada assisted in realizing his vision, and We're All Dying to Live boasts a staggering array of sounds culled from studios both professional and makeshift. Combining processed beats with live studio drums, vintage synths and tack pianos propelling Beach Boys harmonies across a minefield of harps, trumpets, and children's choirs, it plays like Wayne Coyne's spiritual heir piloting Arcade Fire's burning carousel to the front door of Daft Punk's beachside bouncy castle to kick off the end-times party of the year.
Why don't guys understand that a good cry is sometimes just that... good?
In the box set Quadrophenia by The Who (my favourite Who album) there is an essay by Pete Townsend, where he describes how the many facets of the album came about. I won’t go into everything it covers other than to say, the essay is interesting if you like the album, and you like the story, or the details behind albums. There are also good photos, reproductions of notes, and other things in the box set (click the picture above to view it on Amazon). I love the Quadrophenia album so for me, well it’s all good. However as someone getting back the writing bug there was one part of the essay which stood out a bit more in a different way, and this concerns how to write something that makes sense to the audience.
Have you ever felt that you were abandoned by God?
I like www.Gist.com because it scrapes the web, RSS feeds, Facebook and Twitter for postings and mentions of the people and companies you add to it and it provides a dashboard to see it all.
Put 30 cake cases into muffin tins.
The problem with the solution as he sees it of Islam being taken over by a secular Ataturk type figure is that this has been tried many times before. To this very day, there are many such experiments going on. They always or almost always fail.
in the idea stage? who will administer the project? Who is the liaison
8. Crumble some more of the dough over the top of the fruit filling...this is not meant to look pretty...just make sure it is sort of evenly spread.
Should you add more to the menu? The answer is quite simply…that depends! Trust the chefs and catering managers on their recommendations. They are professionals and do this ALL THE TIME. However, it is also important to know your group. Are they light eaters or heavy eater? Are they real “meat and potato” kind of folks or are they health conscious? If you know you have a number of vegetarians or vegans, be sure you have options for them. Food allergies are also becoming more and more prevalent and should always be asked about early on in the registration process so you can plan accordingly.
First I found the image I wanted to use. This layout I choose a cluster of hearts. Then put a piece of scrap paper on your Cricut mat - you will be getting this paper a messy and it will have no actual use on your layout.
It’s kind of funny how people remember the great times during their times of loss.
And, well, in that thinking and rethinking of things, I decided to make it clear that not only will I do public speaking, but I actively want to be doing more public speaking gigs. I enjoy it quite a bit, and though stress is often involved, it's a challenge that I genuinely like.
Colorado Springs CO: NavPress c2006
3 care
The last major renovation of the Texas Governor’s Mansion was in 1982, and it left the house with 21 rooms and 8,920 square feet, though private space is still at a premium. For instance, the Conservatory was added on the southwest corner of the house in 1914 so the Family could have an informal place to eat, but since the State Dining Room is so small, at big dinner parties this second room is pressed into service, with the Governor and First Lady shuttling back and forth between rooms.
Finally it was time. I kissed Tom and said goodbye to his parents as the nurse wheeled me down the corridor and through those famous OR swinging doors. I was nervous, so naturally I was cracking jokes and commenting on random things to keep my mind off what was going to happen to me very shortly. One minute I was saying "Whoa, those lights are intense" and then the next I was flying high as everything got very swirly and I was feeling loopy. Just as I was about to say something really stupid, they put the mask over my mouth and told me to breathe - and just like that I was out.
I had three goals for today.
8. Little Bird
fresh linen
So instead of a fake War on Terror, aimed at financing the defense companies forever, in a useless manner, you have some sort of huge campaign, globally: the equivalent of World War III, but a peaceful one.
-I used hand sanitizer and then 5 minutes later, Elliana sucked on my finger. Will she get alcohol poisoning? This also resulted in a phone call to poison control.
And even though we see images of the Eiffel Tower everywhere, it's impossible to not be in awe when standing beneath it. We picnicked on the lawn nearby (with tons of Parisians, as they all had a long holiday weekend), then immediately passed out for a power nap in the sun! Nothing says romance like drooling on your sleeve.
Berkley Prime Crime, Jun 5 2012, $7.99
Without a human rights framework, people become the objects of government policies and practices, rather than empowered, unique, and autonomous rights holders. Development practices designed with normative human rights standards in mind enable people living in poverty to be the subjects actively working their way out of poverty.
and, in my opinion this era was OH so chic.
and dropped again, the earth
After a little more walking, we could see the building and knew were almost to our destination...
I then went to baggage claim and found liz and her family waiting for me. We went to go eat lunch which was good. After that we went to her house and me and liz talked a long time . We went to church which was fun. I met some her friends. They had food after so we ate that then left. We then went to go see her sister brother in law and very cute nephew Justus who is 9 months old. :-) We sat and talked with them for a long time then came home.
* people wearing Depends- 2,479
Pomegranate Vinaigrette:
Add to this Checkpoint Charlie. The Stasi Museum, the Stasi prison, the DDR Museum, and “The Story of Berlin” -- which includes a guided tour of a nuclear fallout shelter – and it’s almost a little much.
It worked. Dearest and the others looked at each other with that look that women have mastered that let's us men know just how inadequate we are, without them having to bother thinking of words that can express the same sentiment.
I presume Dawkins' will provide well substantiated research results later in the book to support these statements. Taken as they are though, I can see no reason why either atheism or theism should create either a healthy mind or an unhealthy one. The authority statement is similarly woolly and requires substantiating evidence. In comments posted on the blog in response to earlier articles I have posted on religion writers have made the point that concerns of morality, welfare, honesty, politics and life goals are common to atheists and are not the sole province of theists. This would seem to indicate some commonality of thinking and it does rather seem as if Dawkins' is trying to apply his own traits to a larger section of the community.
2˜Literary Comprehension
The series will cover about 100 Greek myths in a largely chronological order, making the books also useful for older readers, too, as an introduction the Greek gods and heroes – especially if they are planning to see the recently-released Percy Jackson film.
5) K-12 Education (also public, private, charter, university, MA/PhD, internships/coops, fellowships, and various forms of professional certification and training)
After Boscoe died, he spent a lot of time hiding under the dining room table and lying in his bed, alert, head up, listening. And then he seemed to relax.
Murakami's book has a (pardon the analogy, but perhaps it is no accident) long distance runner pace to it. He measures his steps and we are invited into his reflections on life. His running stories are told at a runner's pace with a stream of consciousness style that kept me engaged from start to finish. He does set up the New York marathon as a goal, but it's not a great build up because he's not an elite runner, and there are other stories to be told before he even gets to New York. These other stories are not told in a chronological order, so he moves to and from the goal of the New York marathon dipping into other events in his life, which is why the marathon's importance seems less so in the greater picture, just as it would in life. Besides it's not the kind of book that is about the outcome; it's about the process. Afterall, this is a memoir and is more reflective in nature.
It’s good to remember some of the things we learn so that we don’t have to keep going over the same stuff; like from Abraham – - “We can’t get it wrong,” and “You’ll never get it done.” . . accepting that, it kinda frees one up to just go and do what you need to do. It honestly doesn’t matter which choices we make, as long as they are ours and we want to do them.. When you look at some of the plans offered here and there, we often find someone is trying to sell us something, perhaps the plan itself, some supplements which promise to help us or fix our problems and so on. May not like it, but that’s how everything seems to work – - hey people gotta make a living right? Totally understandable.
I'd seen Matt's blog, "Pots for the Kitchen From the Shed", and liked what I saw there. So I'd emailed him, had his reply, and thought, if I could go on to Evesham, we could meet, and I could buy a pot from him. So it was, I thought, I'll turn up late morning, see some pots, go for a pub lunch and a pint, then set off on the road north again.
Coming back to life as a hillbilly.
What is the PRIZE this challenge???? The winner gets their choice of 2 digi or one rubber stamps from the previously mentioned image ranges. Worth playing for right??
What led me to the writing of ONE FOR THE MURPHYS was a line that popped into my head one day while washing dishes. But what lead to that line appearing there? Well, it was years of observation. Of wondering. Of planning.
If nothing else, please please please don't compare your books to Stephen King and Cormac McCarthy yourself. Let someone else do it.
My Girlfriends Dads A Vicar 1:08
Then in verse 18;
“That which does not kill us makes us stronger.”
I first measured and cut my wallpaper piece to fit the size of the wall, leaving a little extra on the top and bottom. Then I was ready to go. With the prepasted wallpaper, I dragged it through the Wallcovering Water Bucket until the entire wallpaper backing was covered and wet.
Martin wrote the orchestral arrangements and instrumentation in collaboration with them. It was Martin's idea to put a string quartet on "Yesterday". To demonstrate his point he played it in the style of Bach to show what "voicings" could be used. To realise "Penny Lane" McCartney hummed the melody, and Martin wrote it in music notation and David Mason, the classically trained trumpeter played it in a piccolo trumpet solo. Eleanor Rigby was heightened by Martin's strings-only accompaniment inspired by Bernard Hermann's score for Alfred Hitchcock's film Psycho.
Feeling unknown,
I played.
people, all with the same name.
Warnings stern and plaintive
So I'll cherish these little moments we have because I know someday soon, I won't be able to hold you anymore. Someday, you won't want to hold my hand anymore and I know someday, you'll probably want me to drop you off a block away from your school, just so you won't be seen with me. But you know what? That's all okay. Whether you want me to or not, I'm still going to scream "I LOVE YOU!" across the school yard, because I do. I love you with all my heart and with every fiber in my body.
Its just been a terrible, long, unending day. I’m tired and I’m going to eat leftover pizza.
While working on the book, Mr. Ruchlis asked one of his students at Lafayette High, a gifted young artist, if he would provide the illustrations for the volume. The student agreed to do the artwork in exchange for $100 and -- now here’s a kid after my own heart -- a passing grade in class.
Well, it didn’t take three weeks to potty training Norrin. We’ve been training for the last three years.
APRIL: RITA ORA
I checked out a stack of books from the library and am planning to hole up and read the weekend away and work on narrowing my focus!
I think it's funny, even as a former New Yorker, but in reality, the same myopia exists for the part of the country that's missing from the middle of Steinberg's map: the "heartland," the "real America," the part that isn't, presumably, within easy driving distance of an ocean. The irony inherent in people in the center calling themselves the "real America," though, is that the majority of Americans live on the coasts.
I think I experienced one of the worst 24 hours of my life. The thought of not knowing what was going on and knowing if something was wrong I couldn't comfort her. I am so truly blessed and grateful to have her in my life and I already love this little girl with all of my heart. Going through what Lincoln and I went through yesterday day really makes you think of everything that is truly important in life and what really matters. I am so blessed with an amazing husband and 3 wonderful little boys and my little girl who I can't wait to meet.
None of that social crap
The Green Ray, translated by M. de Hauteville By Jules Verne (Google Books) (Page 306)
The cushioning of Saucony shoes is very well-designed. They are made to protect your feet and to give you comfort. Saucony running shoes are very flexible and can support your feet with every stride.
These lovely oils are available at Tesco's and Sainsbury's nationwide, as well as select healthfood retailers. You can also purchase it online at Free from & Fine Foods . The High Five Omega Cooking Oil sells for about £6.99 for 500ml and the Organic Omega Cool Oil sells for about £8.49 for a 250ml bottle. They are a bit pricey, but I personally think they are well worth the money spent. I highly recommend.
Aww yeah I’m just the pepper spray cop getting
Echinacea
Week 9 is the first week of the second term of my creative writing course. To recap, the three term course is split up like this; Term 1 – Chapter 1. Term 2 – Chapter 2. Term 3 – Chapter 3. Each chapter is worked on over a term and then handed in at the end, marked and then returned the following term.
Pauline Baird Jones began her writing career penning romantic suspense (fictional murder doesn’t get you strip searched!) but she had a secret longing to ramp up the spills, chills and daring do. By chance she wrote a science fiction romance, realized she’d been mixing fiction into her science since high school (oops, sorry science teachers!), and thought, why not go where she hasn’t gone before? After that, it was easy to stir in some steampunk. The Key was the first in her Project Enterprise series, which will conclude with #6, Kicking Ashe.
Women who are deliberately childless will regret it. I am not sorry for women who sacrifice their lives for children. I am not sorry for those women who have many children. But I am sorry … for women who come to the Judgment Day who have never assumed the responsibility of rearing children, who have been afraid of pain, resistant to sacrifice. They are the ones whose hearts will be heavy.
I hope you find beauty in your day today!
Who has $ 8,000.00 dollars for a microphone? I have decided to add a Tube Mic to keep my lonley Sennheiser 416 company, a brand new Apex 460 ($ 249.00 Retail) into something that “Pimped Out” gets rave reviews all over the internet. Dozens of professional Microphone Modders/Builders use several different versions of the Apex 460, and change out the parts (additional $ 200.00 – 600.00 Retail) to more resemble the classic C12. Keep in mind that this is a TUBE Microphone, and the power supply voltages can KILL you if you do not know what you are doing when making internal changes to the power supply in addition to the Microphone.
It is God who has saved all his people and has restored to all of them their inheritance, the kingdom, the priesthood, and the sacred rites, as he promised through the law.
According to the Sunday Times, Shiceka spent R300,000 of taxpayers’ money on a single visit to his girlfriend who is serving time in a Swiss prison, a detail initially thought to be the invention of satirists but confirmed by Swiss authorities who asked the media not to make “insensitive remarks about turf wars between rival gangs of yodellers”.
November 11
"Hmm...there are a bunch of...pictures?"
I made a small Storm Cloud Shawlette (designed by Hanna Breetz and offered for free) using my handspun, ~220 yards of two-ply Shetland wool hand-dyed by The Thylacine. The shawl couldn't be simpler to make and it shows off the color shifts in the yarn. I ran out of yarn before I was quite ready to be finished, so worked in some gray handspun I had left from an earlier shawlette along the bottom ruffle.
The Angels lead the way so far regarding cards for a specific team, I have 28 out of the 50 for them.
Although people with dark hair may still produce the yellow-orange pheomelanin, it is largely masked by the dark eumelanin pigment and cannot easily be seen. However, the red-yellow pheomelanin is believed to cause the warm, golden, or auburn tones found in some types of brown hair. The range of colors produced by melanins is limited to shades of yellow, brown, red, and black. Grey hairs contain only a few melanin granules, spread out through the hair. White hairs contain no melanin at all: their whiteness is an optical effect, due to the way they reflect the light.
He goes around mourning because people who don’t have the kind of desire he has for God—are so heartless toward him. Even though he is consumed with a great love for the Lord, he lives with the daily assault of the enemy of his soul. He grows tired of the battle and his loneliness for more of God.
Could it be that a generation, the elderly, which was held in such high regards in the past, has now, in today’s society been forgotten? And instead is seen as a hinder or bother to care for our elders?
And for the first time on record, family incomes are actually falling. New figures this week from the U.S. Census Bureau show that the median income for working-age households fell 10 per cent between 2000 and 2010, even as women worked more hours.
This movie is rated PG-13. I would love to take my 6yr old son to see the movie, as I know he would LOVE it. But because some of the language is inappropriate for his age, he's going to have to wait. Other than the language, I think the movie is great for all ages.
Round 1
That said, let’s dive in to the world of Lee Jae Ha (Lee Seung Gi) who is currently just the brother to the King. I think his future is about to change, literally.
Heart racing
peace & chicken grease,
#10: The customer is not always right, especially in a strip club.
We begin with the parents of Samson — members of the tribe of Dan. The father's name is Manoah, and he and his wife had no children for the unnamed wife is unable to conceive. She is minding her own business one day when the Lord interrupts: And the angel of the LORD appeared to the woman and said to her, Behold, you are barren and have not borne children, but you shall conceive and bear a son. (Judges 13:3)
Sleep: still unisom... still every night...
*My baby has good days and bad. And they usually follow each other closely. But he is so stinkin' cute. I mean, just look at this:
Funky monkey:
We walk forward not by signs or by our emotions that are full of ups and downs, but by faith. It is about holding on to the scriptures that bare truth, even when everything within us shouts the opposite. This is walking by faith and not by sight, emotions,or reason.
Maybe I did think that. That once I didn't hear more, then there was no more. These soldiers don't often talk, I'm finding. Who can blame them? It's taken me a year to find the words to tell about one meal around my table.
The reality is often far less exciting than the expectations we conjure up -- and the litigation in Meakin v British Broadcasting Corporation, Paul Smith and Celador Productions [2010] EWHC 2065 (Ch), 27 July 2010, raised initial hopes that we would get some hugely important ruling on the protection of TV game-show format rights. As it was, the troops spent years lining up against each other (Meakin first complained of infringement in 2004) but the battle was over before it started, Mr Justice Arnold (Chancery Division, England and Wales) granting the defendants summary judgment against Meakin's claims of copyright infringement.
I said before on my blog that anyone who reads this mental health blog knows me in real life, they should remember that I’m still just me, the person who they usually see, aside from this stuff. But I shouldn’t even feel the need to say that! If I was writing about a physical illness like asthma, diabetes, whatever I doubt I’d feel the need to say that…
Don’t rush things and you’ll find that you’ll have a more fulfilling and happy time.
Would you disagree with me if I say Penang is a hawker’s food paradise? Good food is everywhere in Penang, it’s just a matter of how big is your stomach! So please forget about your diet while you are in Penang. Ahemm, although I did not. Yes, call me a freak! I’m working so hard to lose weight these few months , I can’t put my hard work to waste! :( Ok, my idea was, I can eat anything BUT in a small portion. That way I could sample everything without ballooning my stomach. I think I should do my diet talk on another post because it’s such a potong steam to mention anything about diet now! So, jom makan!
“We’re medical students and couldn’t help but notice the way you walk, but we couldn’t agree on the syndrome you might have. Could you tell us what it is?”
Was that racism, or an expression of disillusionment with a President who is all but a poor carbon copy of his predecessor, the tyrant and US enemy number one GWB?
- Extra fuses
Someone near me said, "That's silly. Of course north should be drawn at the top of the map. Everyone knows north is 'up'."
Julia at Pawleys Island Posh took a basic black table, and made it stunning...thanks to the power of Rust-Oleum! Looks like she and I are set to have a Liberace's Lair face-off!
After that comes the coronal mass ejection, which looks like a growing bubble and takes a couple days to reach Earth. It’s that ejection that could cause magnetic disruptions Thursday.
If you're looking for autographed copies of any of my Blood Coven books, look no further. An awesome Austin-based bookstore has made them available. And they allow you to order online.
But every time I think about the world watching me, a mini panic attack begins.
Joan Bennett will be familiar to any fan of noir due to her work with Fritz Lang on a number of pictures, most notably Scarlet Street and The Woman in the Window. There’s no femme fatale style vamping here though, instead she’s the competent, protective mother driven to near despair as the situation spins out of her control. Her measured underplaying is one of the factors which keeps the movie rooted in noir territory and saves it from straying into melodrama. The other factor is James Mason. Two years earlier Mason had given a blinding performance in Carol Reed’s beautiful and masterful Odd Man Out. Here he’s playing another doomed Irishman, albeit one with more dubious motives. He’s very believable in the role and there’s nothing that seems phony as we witness his self-doubts transform him.
Pakistan has been plagued by sectarian attacks, with Shia Muslims targeted by radical Sunni groups.
5. Country Joe McDonald - Air Algiers
we mostly just rambled around
Griffiths Little is the recipient of the Southwest Book Award, The Whitney Award for Best Youth Novel of 2010, and the author of the highly acclaimed, The Healing Spell and Circle of Secrets, published by Scholastic Press. Look for her books at the Scholastic Book Fairs, as
I’m pretty sure that most people that are in the realm of agent or manager in comedy in Canada think that their phone only receives calls. Otherwise a fair number of people in this country should be household names and millionaires. Ron James has created a great blueprint to follow in terms of creating a great fan base. That’s not to say that it can’t be tweaked, changed or improved on – but it’s one hell of a starting point.
I’m sure that for many women these things are of interest and that’s their choice. But it’s the fact that so many publications, including so-called ‘newspapers’, continue to make the unreasonable assumption that ALL women are interested in this disposable subject matter and non-events that bothers me.
(1) No one shall be held in slavery or servitude.
“He had a good dream. It’s the only dream you can have—to come out number 1 man.”—Willy Loman
The good news is the giant dog I dragged off the street one day (she was a stray) is giant & growing daily, which means she can reach ANYTHING, no matter the height at which you put it. So she’s destroyed about a third of the stuff I wanted to sell/toss anyway. Thanks, Blizzard.
3. Family prideChatting with a married Western man, you may need to wait hours before he mentions his wife. Chatting with a married Shanghainese man, you may need to wait hours before he stops talking about his wife.When a Shanghainese man begins dating, gets engaged or is having a baby, he blasts out the news to every single contact on his cell phone. For Shanghai men, enjoying life with family is far better than going it alone. Proud Shanghainese husbands take their wives to every event they attend, from school reunions to team-building exercises at work.
OK... now on to my project:
Here are those items and a few more from previous shopping trips. OK, so I now have to move it all to a new apartment. Worth it? Oh yeah.
Let me have you just one moment more
I have found that the more trials you go through in life....the greater your love of music becomes, even if it is hard to listen to at times. When Haley was so sick and fighting for her life, each song I heard brought on a new meaning!! Although I love music that is upbeat in tempo....I have found that if you really put the lyrics first, there is much more GREAT music out there than you realize!!! So I thougth it would kind of be fun to share some of my music favorites on "Tune in Tuesdays" and in return, maybe you will leave feedback on some of your favortie artists or songs!! I would love to hear them!!
Light be, oh light is!
Stamps: Inspired By Christmas - My Favorite Things
organisation (SIS); a journalistic and publishing organisation (SM); and a charity (SET). We therefore find that not only is
James Saunders – A Child Crying
If you happened to learn about Harold Camping’s May 21 rapture prediction from a placard on a subway car or bus shelter in New York City, the ad was probably funded by Robert Fitzpatrick – a 60-year-old, retired transit worker from Staten Island who invested his entire life savings of $140,000 into the campaign.
If the cause of the performance issue is not ability, then explore the willingness or motivational component of performance. They may have a confidence issue relative to the task. Perhaps you will have to increase your relationship activity with this person, such as encouraging them.
So K, here you go....
So I have to run upstairs and help count and then back downstairs to read the violation to this idiot before they take him to the Hive.
In the next installment of this series, I will give you a little bit of background on how I got from ‘there to here,’ that is, some of the journey I have taken into the dark cold world that is the paid ministry.
that were in
He is, and always has been (excepting a youthful aberration where he told all who would listen that he had once won 132 awards in a single cricket presentation evening) a man of great humility, so it’s hard to get out of him exactly what he’s achieving in the subcontinent.
I was making dinner (steak for Jason, BBQ chicken sandwich for me) and was using a serrated bread knife to slice my ciabatta roll in half. And I made a rookie mistake with the knife. I didn't get my left index finger out of the way. Yes, I sliced my left index finger open.
Eyes closed, I relaxed into “Wish You Were Here” on my iPod as we landed at Sheremetyevo, hoping (to no avail) that I could recapture the same thrill I felt as our train clattered towards Moscow in late summer of 1991. I recall singing along while one of the guitar-playing students in our group muddled through the chords, as the well-lighted West shrank behind us, and eerie, green-gray, fishbowl images of Soviet Russia scrolled by our windows.
Upon entry to the Grand Palais, you are directed towards a quietly swishing revolving door. It's dark and nobody talks. There are signs everywhere warning you're about to enter a "pressurized area" so if you're pregnant, or a tiny baby, or have circulation issues, or maybe just a curious rash, RUN, GET THE HELL OUT OF HERE YOU'RE GONNA DIE. As we approached the dark, quietly swishing revolving door, Lucien's hand got a little sweaty and he said, "Uhh, mommy?" Then I said, "Go, son, enjoy art!" and pushed him through the door. He'll thank me someday for "encouraging" him to push through his fears.
I have state testing tomorrow.
Machine ~ There But For The Grace Of God Go I ~ RCA ~ 1979
I have starched them because they curl up such a lot. I made the trumpet similar to the large one above, made it smaller and modified the frill. Do you do this kind of thing too? I find I get an idea from here, a colour scheme from there put it together and although not totally original, something new.
And Chewy's favorite:
1 passes
Well, my shoe came loose and I tripped over it and I fell on all fours. I was still down trying to re-group… wondering what the heck just happened… when the light turned green and I was almost hit by a car. I’m not sure if the car that was waiting at the light wasn’t paying attention and didn’t see me crossing and then my fall, but the tires of his/her car came close to my feet. Talk about getting your adrenaline going after lunch!
Shame on those who fell for it, raised the hysteria, lied and used the prayer leader to raise their own public profile.
47% Increase In Debt Under Obama. (U.S. Treasury Department, Accessed 4/10/12)
2:30pm Park Ave closes including ramps from Hwy 1 until 5:30 pm
This holiday season, be thankful for every healthy day you have and don't ever, ever take that health for granted.
"2. Whisk together flour, corn starch, and salt in a bowl. Add to butter mixture, and mix on low speed until just combined.
-hot sauce to taste
From this we can learn that the government was acting in a "profoundly unwise" way over the EU's fiscal pact, and was "taking both political and legal risks by suggesting the need for action while failing to explain how it will carry it through or what concessions it seeks".
I do have pictures of our mini vacation but I haven't even looked at the camera yet to see what is on it. I'll be back soon with more to share.
1 – 4 p.m. Brewery Ommegang, Sampling in the Beer Department
OK after all that, I need to eat some dinner as it is after 8 and my lunch at work was a bit lame/not filling.
At a recent BEabove virtual staff meeting (I think I was walking around the lake while Ursula was having a pedicure — we’re very good at work/life integration — or wait was that just multi-tasking? Shoot. Well back to my point anyway), we started talking about the profundity of this statement. It really fits with our understanding of the Seven Levels of Effectiveness – the world literally shows up differently at each level.
Your my dawn that gives me light and hope… and I’ll be waiting for my dawn to arrive… But for now, I’ll be seeing lots of sunsets.
4) Take a Xanax.
I found a seat on the fourth row center. And nobody came to sit in front of me. No gigantic head of a seven-foot tall person in front of me. I am the woman who manages to find a ticket to a sold out movie and then watch it with unobstructed view. Sometimes.
“It’s my escape from Subang. This place gets a little suffocating after awhile. Cheras is my home. It’s where I just sit back and chill, you know? Nobody to impress.”
I wish I had read these tips before joining critique sites and critiquing. I often took the tone of the last person who critiqued me and it wasn’t until I had a couple of good critiques myself, that I learned what I needed to do. And I’m still learning!
It was just David and me and the sound of the Deuce's heartbeat, which David remarked sounds just like the bridge at Silver Dollar City where you hear the sounds of galloping hooves as you're walking across it. I had David take this picture of me.
Skip spoke to his father, often in e-mails, about that kill, about every subsequent one and about all the ugliness he witnessed in a faraway land.
G: Does his work beg questions about class?
I first heard Seamus Heaney read his poetry in 1972 in London University. He shared a platform with Ted Hughes. I remember a student calling out, 'What about the Irish Times?' I didn't understand what he meant but I knew that Heaney had been accused of ignoring the situation in Northern Ireland in his writing. In fact Heaney's work does reflect the troubles but hs view was that he was his own man and would write what he wanted to write.
After being contacted by IGN, the company did provide the following, which is a rather generic company statement:
Needless to say, life is not all about me however and so it goes. I have quickly become aware that the lives of a few of our Blog friends have been touched with the loss of loved ones including the loss of one our own, Renee. Perhaps, in the back of my mind and in my heart, there were indeed some inevitabilities that I knew were going to pass. And yet, these are the things that are so far out of our grasp that it is all we can do to hold onto today. Funny, how as I sit here a moment and think of such things, that my pain appears to be temporarily bearable. Life........go figure.
When our kids were smaller we did do baskets. Honestly my kids have candy, ice cream, cookies, several times a week so I really don't see the point of getting them a bunch on Easter. I did get them all a chocolate bunny and they decorated eggs because they wanted to.
Some people may have noticed that I’m not as active on the “social media” front as I have been. There’s a good reason for this, although I’m not sure how many other people would consider it a good reason. I’d like to say it’s because I’m busy. Or travelling a lot. Or abducted by aliens. It’s much simpler than that, though.
Now, like ‘jumbo shrimp’ or ‘military intelligence’ this seems a little like a double negative in its very lunacy. Why does a brewery promote and distribute a game that discourages beer drinking? Why does a brewery think that a drinking game will NOT be used for drinking beer? Why does the Marketing Department of said brewery proclaim surprise when told that teenagers were using this drinking game to drink beer? Because, as I said, they are dickheads. It’s another sad case of a brewery being about the money instead of being about the beer.
It seems an “Ima” was the heroine in Jim Hogg’s brother Tom’s epic poem, “The Fate of Marvin” (Yeah, really romantic names, there, Tom), and the Gov was just showing some family loyalty, albeit the blind sort, in the naming of his only daughter. Not long after Jim Hogg died, oil was discovered on his land, and his children became rich as Croesus. “Miss Ima” never married, became a generous philanthropist, and always defended her name with pride.
My head is spinning with the stimulation and expectations I have for myself. I paint, go through every emotion from disgust to mild acceptance, and then remind myself that this is supposed to be fun; not a race or competition. I remember and then I forget. My art training has made me stern.
Anyway, the following recipe is more like a method than anything else. Please feel free to adjust the ingredients' ratio, according to your preferences. The measurements I gave below are all an approximation, as I eyeballed everything, and tasted the mix every now and then until I've convinced myself that I've come close to KFC-coleslaw taste that I was trying to achieve.
If you do buy this particular type of necklace, give, you are some some to choose from.
Sea or kosher salt and pepper
Any writer can tell you that life isn’t fair. It ain't. But every so often, for no perceptible reason, life gets it exactly right.
My son is up again, and he too is rattled. He misses quite a few notes, but recovers and finishes his piece. When he exits the stage and sits with his class, I can see the deluge he is holding back behind red eyes. He tries to hold it together. But a mother knows.
She mustn’t forget,
Caroline was a young 18 year old prostitute. I have no idea how my mother met her, just one day she was there... living with us. Her 'thing' was being paid to shit on men; that's what she did. She said that some men like that. Laughing, she explained that the best thing to eat if she didn't want to hang around too long was spicy curry or Mexican. Like many prostitutes I have since known, she seemed to take an enormous pride in her hustle, saying that no-one could “drop a load” like her. But we were young and it was just a big joke.
Then in a series of articles, I again focused the attention of the public about the land issue on the historical facts...
Art! Don’t forget to visit the Gallery! Here are some peeks at some of the newest pieces that have been added to the Galleries of Stone section. Click the preview to view the full images!
NB. We are still looking for writers for our blog, you can write on any technology, security, privacy or Kopimism related subject and you need not write everyday, instead you could just contribute once a fortnight or once a month. Interested, leave us a comment.
Educate yourself about the differences between gender identity and sexual identity to avoid common misconceptions. For example, a genetically female person can identify her gender as male, yet still be attracted to men. Make no assumptions about your friend’s sexual preference. It has nothing to do with gender identity.
you do not know when the Lord of the house is coming,
My meeting with Frederica at the annual booksellers convention led to a later July event at the San Francisco bookstore where I was then working. At the time, Maas was nearly blind and frail, and at this - her first ever bookstore author event - she agreed instead to be interviewed about her remarkable life. I sat with her and asked questions about the many remarkable personalities she had known - Brooks, Clara Bow, Norma Shearer, Erich von Stroheim and others.
Photography – BRAD OLIPHANT (bradoliphantphotography.com)
(For the man was a coffin-maker,)
A pivotal chapter in the life of Maisie Dobbs, A Lesson In Secrets marks the beginning of her intelligence work for the Crown. As the storm clouds of World War II gather on the horizon, Maisie will confront new challenges and new enemies—and will engage new readers and loyal fans of this bestselling mystery series.
Feeling uninspired for the the past couple of weeks; I checked my camera to see what I had been up to and this was all I found. I feel like the scene in American Beauty where they watch the ridiculous video of the plastic bag floating around in the wind- minus the mind-blowing epiphany. So please bear with me and my pseudo-meaningful photos of windows and doors...
“I said until I’m bored.”
You will need an equal number of eggs and bread slices. You can use whatever your favorite bread is; we usually use cheap wheat bread, but you could use white or whole grain if you want. Using a glass or round cookie cutter, cut a 2″ diameter circle out of the middle of each slice of bread. Set the rounds aside for now. Liberally butter a flat griddle over medium heat. Place the sliced bread with the holes on the griddle and crack an egg into each hole. We leave the yolks intact, but you can break the yolk if you like. Fry on one side until golden brown. Now here is the tricky part; You have to flip each Toad in the Hold, but before you put it back on the griddle you need to add more butter. Continue frying until egg is desired consistency (over medium or over hard) and bread is golden brown. The rounds can be grilled in the butter at the same time as the Toad in the Holes (the tastier option if you have room on the griddle), or buttered and toasted in a toaster oven; they can be eaten plain or with jam.
Obviously this isn't working so well. I've told myself we'd give it until Allie's a year old until we do anything "drastic" (and no, I have no idea what "drastic" means for us. I know it doesn't mean straight-up CIO, but it might involve some more crying than happens now). And for better or worse, I do keep hoping. Like the nights she falls asleep without nursing and goes to sleep on her own. I think *awesome*, she can fall asleep by herself! But what works one night, doesn't necessarily work the next. And I have to be honest - routine is challenging for both me and my dh. Maybe Allie NEEDS routine, and we're not giving it to her. At least not as "rigidly" as she would like. I don't know... (and of course if I *knew* anything about parenting, life would be so much easier - right?!). :)
Check out who else will be there too.
I am not broken. Beaten to a pulp – absolutely.
“I wonder if it matters that what they have aimed at is illusion. Their lives are in themselves beautiful. I have an idea that the only thing which makes it possible to regard this world we live in without disgust is the beauty which now and then men create out of the chaos. The pictures they paint, the music they compose, the books they write, and the lives they lead. Of all these the richest in beauty is the beautiful life. That is the perfect work of art.”
Oh yeah, and now in the aftermath, it’s obvious that I somehow manipulated him into 13 years of “alleged” happiness. I’m such a bitch.
The very nature of this film brings up a number of questions that beg to be answered. For instance, is Otami just a spirit slut who gets off on banging her hubby's buddies, or does she have no choice, forced to repeat her sins over and over again even in death? And was the attraction and sexual tension between Alex and Laura always there, or was it created by Otami? And, perhaps most importantly, how did Ben grow such a sensational mustache?
I've been meaning to get to this project for months but finally had the perfect excuse. I love how crib and toddler bedding is interchangeable, making the lifetime of things much longer. My daughter recently transferred from a crib to a toddler bed and I was so excited to be able to transfer the bedding along with her.
We cannot calculate the length and breadth of even this universe, yet there are millions and millions of universes like this one within the material sky. And above this material sky there is another sky, which is called the spiritual sky. In that sky all the planets are eternal, and life is eternal, also. We cannot know these things by our material calculations, so we must take this information from the Bhagavad-gītā.
I almost forgot how enjoyable and amazing it is the beauty around us, that we often take for granted. Little things that put a smile in your face, that make your heart filled with joy, and that brighten your day, just like this meyer lemon tart. My fridge is always full of lemons (meyer lemons in particular) this winter, and I don't even have a lemon tree. I got some from friends at church who have lemon tree in their backyard, from my coworkers, from everywhere that I don't have to worry about this particular citrus whenever I need it. Unfortunately, I haven't been doing them some justice this season; notice that I haven't made anything citrus-y this winter. I do have a long list of lemon desserts I want to make, but it's just so hard to find the time here and there, and if I do have the time, something else always come up last minute.
David M. Charlebois, 39, Washington, D.C
2) Advertising copywriter
I made this face as Angus was staring at me (I was doing peekaboo or some such), and of course Mr. Dina was snapping the photo at the same moment. Whatever. It just shows that I can do other faces besides *smile* *half-smile* and *look pensive*.
I don’t think that taking a break now and then is such a bad thing, even though we’re all kind of programmed to think that any need for a break equals failure. In my own mind, and in my own life, it’s really important to listen to your body. So if you need a break, then you should take one. I certainly take them as needed. Today, for example, I could have gone running between my classes in the 5-hour break I had between them. But thanks to sleeping poorly last night, I fell asleep on the couch and had a mid-day nap, and then after work, I spent the leftover daylight organizing my files and course plans in order to clear my mind.
Thirteen Reasons Why by Jay Asher
Edited to note - This started out around a 1.020, I think. I should have done a better job of reading that specifically. Here's where we are now. Going to 2nd it because it really needs some clarification if my husband is going to drink it at all. :)
I'm sitting on my couch with my heating pad on my lower back right now. I cleaned my bathroom yesterday and the backlash of that is major back spasms and unremitting headache. I also got bit by a tick in the upper, fleshy part of my arm (like there's a part of my arm that isn't fleshy) and it's swollen and itching like a motherfucker. I suspect, from experience, I'm incubating a case of cellulitis that is going to require antibiotics. I am not a happy camper.
Hello everyone , welcome to my room . Special welcome to new followers , Lee and Elainea1.
Ans so you make examples of people who are in this case not compliant with the law. Find people who are not compliant with the law, and you hit them as hard as you can and you make examples out of them, and there is a deterrent effect there.
Second, the facile equation of historical African-American oppression with the modern grievances of the left should give pause. The horrible history of slavery, racism, lynching, ghettoism and oppression in America confers upon African-Americans a unique narrative. Similarly, the Holocaust — the genocidal slaughter, ghettoism, and oppression of mid-20th-century Europe and elsewhere — confers upon Jews a unique narrative. African-Americans and Jews are understandably resistant to lots of piggy-backing on these narratives — particularly when the piggy-backing comes from loud political groups that suffered nothing even remotely approaching slavery or genocide.
So from the team at Ras Mbisi, Asante sana and Karibu tena Ras Mbisi xx
This may be just the thing you are looking for to make your rooms and spaces come alive. Perhaps you require a space that is more calming? That’s coming up in another post! What else defines or creates movement in a room or space for you?
Synopsis: Krank is a scientist who cannot dream, so what does he do? He steals dreams! From children no less! He gets a hold of these children through a religious cult composed entirely of Cyclops! In order to belong to this cult, you have to loose your own eye sight so that you can see the way the Cyclops see. Now the Cyclops have kidnapped Dunree, One’s baby brother. One, the hero of this film, must begin a journey with his new friend Miette to rescue Dunree from the clutches of the Cyclops and ultimately Krank himself. Krank wants Dunree and all of the children of the city for himself, so he can steal their dreams!
To speed up the process of making this bread, I turned the oven on to its lowest temperature (170 degrees) just prior to each of the bread rising periods. I then turned the oven off when I put the bread in to proof and rise. It sped up the process by a good hour, and the texture of the bread was fantastic.
Not quite putting two and two together yet, I started trying to wean myself off the Indomethacin, and was able to completely wean myself off within a couple weeks. Yay! I still had my headache, but it wasn't horrible and I was still functional. I don't like being medicated as a general rule, so this was good.
G. Bananas
I wonder how long Amazon will take to decide this is not in public domain, I didn't steal it from somewhere and publish it so I can immediately upload the corrected version so we can begin the process again.
Good evening to you all. It has been a very eventful weekend. Yesterday was the official opening of my store JAZZLIN DESIGNS. Unfortunately the weather was terrible, and i'm sure it put off a few customers from venturing out, but still I had a nice day meeting some new crafting ladies. I have had a positive feedback with regards to the sensational sweet pea stamps that I am selling instore and I feel sure everyone will love them as much as I do by the time I have finished promoting them!
The only way a horde might happen is if, again, we are working on the assumption that the zombie plague also creates some kind of pheromonal IFF signal (Identify Friend-or-Foe). Not only is this ridiculously complex (and thus unlikely), it also reduces the likelihood of perfect transmission, meaning *splat*–again no hordes.
When they reach the County Court Building, Mr. Popper is waiting for them. They're 10 minutes late. Mr. Lawrence is appalled by the sight of William's friends coming out to greet them, while Mr. Popper, bemused, shakes some of their hands. William embraces Jane.
70 Moby Dick – Herman Melville
How we get graded then is firstly by time and by the crew we get to directly compare to being the World Champion light weight four. They are a great benchmark. Secondly via time we get compared to other categories with our best benchmark being the percentage of World Best time. Each catagory has its WB and as such we all get our percentage and then in a way we compare event to event. Conditions between raced can change but it's a good way to see relativity for example between our four and the mens quad scull, the men's eight, women's double etc.
On Monday, March 1, 2010, at approximately 11:00 p.m., Constable Artem “James” OCHAKOVSKY, while operating a marked police cruiser, was involved in a two-vehicle collision in the intersection of Airport Road and Steeles Avenue East. Constable OCHAKOVSKY was taken to the Sunnybrook Health Sciences Centre with critical injuries, where, despite the hospital staff’s best efforts, he succumbed to his injuries.
Season-to-date, CBS is first in viewers (12.13m) and adults 25-54 (4.1/10) and a strong second in adults 18-49 (3.1/08). The Network is posting across-the-board year-to-year growth, up +1% in viewers, +2% in adults 25-54 and +3% in adults 18-49.
Many of you have asked about the concert in New York. We had a BLAST! Our dear friends Adam and Jamie came with us. We left at 4:30 in the morning and rolled into NYC around 3:30pm. A really good friend of Jamie’s, Anna, invited all of us to stay with her in Queens- so we checked in, took the subway to Manhattan, got some dinner at a local deli and then went to Webster Hall. The doors opened at 6:00 and we were greeted by the energetic 46NYC crew, including Graham Bunn, who hosted the event. Chris Suiter, from North Carolina opened and then Graham took the time to introduce us to all those who came out to support Ryan through the concert. The CAB played an incredible acoustic set after which we were able to meet many of the people who came to the show. So many people wanted to share their own stories with us (that were very moving) and others wanted to find out how do more to advocate for Reece’s Rainbow kids and Ryan. The night continued on from there with an after party at the Pourhouse. This mama was tired! But, oh what a great night! There are still concert shirts available- and
A big thanks to Andi who mentioned JNSQ in her Saturday Six this week, a great round up of blog posts from travelers, experts, expats and loads of other cool people.... what was she thinking adding me?
• Dan Amira at New York Magazine joked that “Lean Forward” is hardly the best corporate jingle out there, and suggested a handful of others, including “It’s not TV, it’s BHO” and “Got health insurance?”
Griffin’s choice of Carlos Cortiglia to be the BNP’s London mayoral candidate was outrageous enough because of the Uruguayan-born foreigner’s (unsuccessful) attempt to volunteer to fight for Argentina against Britain during the Falklands War—but far worse lay in store.
In looming masses piled;
First off, I beat Amanda in March at the Amazing Loan Race. For those of you who don’t know what that is, click the link above, or just know that I’m trying to beat my friend in a student loan payoff contest. I paid $948 on my loans in March. Amanda paid $100. In her defense, she had a feline-related emergency. The adorable animal in question is doing much better, and Amanda has vowed to destroy me this month, loan-wise.
"Did you have a good time with Jessica?" her mom asked.
I must emphasize that this is a neutral credit--it isn't tied to alternate energy. Those who wish to keep a gas-guzzling lifestyle not be prevented from doing so. But nothing will be done in this proposal to decrease the marginal price of gas. I should als mention that this is envisioned as a short-term credit--essentially a form of stimulus--not a long-term entitlement. It could be structured as a separate line item, or simply as an increase in the standard deduction or personal exemption.
For more information about Resolve, infertility and National Infertility Awareness Week, please visit:
3) 'No, I don't want to answer the phone, just as I put the first mouthful of Roast Beef and Yorkshire Pudding into my mouth, all mixed up with a little bit of the BEST GRAVY EVER, just because some BUGGER decides to RING AT SUNDAY LUNCHTIME and no, I am NOT NEAREST to the phone. YOU ARE.'
Happy Winter!
Shorthand is another language which has a logic to it, and similar to JQuery, it also has a ‘library’ of commonly written symbols. The only difference is that you can hack at Teeline shorthand, as often it is only you who has to translate it. Ah those were the days…
In his Senate speech, Sen. Inhofe said the video provides Americans with “a glimpse of the Obama administration’s true agenda.”
For each scene, decide how you’re going to refer to your characters at the beginning of the scene and be consistent with it. If your character is Mary Doe, you can refer to her as Mary, Mary Doe, Ms/Miss/Mrs. Doe or some other name, but it must be consistent throughout the scene.
I found it a quick but hard-hitting read, with some deliciously creepy moments along the way, fusing the quiet menace of The Invasion of the Body Snatchers with the thought-provoking ideas of The Matrix into one exciting premise. The pithy, amusing and occasionally revelatory text notes are a nice touch. Between the testimony and the 'editorial input', everything starts to come together, but until the big reveal I still wasn't quite sure what had happened! One for boys AND girls to enjoy, and I'd say it was suitable for younger YA readers as well, though they might not pick up on some of the references and humour that an older reader would. Recommended!
No, but my sister sure was when she was a kid, weren't you, Deb? She freaked at the part where the ship and the town are firing canons at each other and the canonballs "land" in the water next to the boat. I mean, she FREAKED! She ducked down and hid on the bottom of the boat so she wouldn't get shot. LOL! Ahhh, good times, good times...
The Run Less, Run Faster program is not just about running. Cross training and strength training are essential components of the regimen. Cross training allows the runner to work the heart and lungs, while giving the running muscles a break. Strength training builds both the muscles directly used in running and those used to support the rest of the body during activity. Incorporating these elements into my routine kept me injury- and boredom-free.
It is clear that what sustains us today as a nation was first preserved for us by those who underwent very painful conditions of racial intolerance, hatred and oppression.
*Wonderful Tonight – Eric Clapton
6. The big one: dear readers, I am pregnant, at this point about 13 weeks. In the middle of everything, I have some rather serious bleeding. An emergency scan reveals that the foetus is ok, but I am ordered to bed; no travelling.
Yeah 3x - Chris Brown
At the risk of sounding like my father, it wasn’t that long ago that the worst parents had to fear was catching their kids sneaking a sip of hooch behind the barn. Then we see the use of marijuana increase, and now meth is the drug du jour. Of course, we can’t discount the abuse of prescription pain killers either.
To recap: Peach and Olive first enjoyed a couple of weeks of dance camp and one week of Information Bible School. They kicked ass in their first horse show. They spent lots of quality time with both sets of grandparents and both great-grandmothers – the latter of which included assisting Mama Turista in the complete dismantling, painting, and reassembling of Abuelita Turista’s kitchen and living room (No small feat, that.). They traveled by car, boat, train, and Mule. And finally, they swam and swam and swam some more in the ocean, several rivers, and the nearby pool we joined for the summer.
That said, to my utter surprise and delight, I love my fat, pregnant belly. The bigger it gets, the happier I get. Every time I look at it in the mirror, every time I run my hands over it, or my partner falls asleep with her arm encircling it, I love it even more, because I can feel the movements of what will be our child. I feel so awash in a deep deep love for all of us, me, my gorgeous spouse and this little eventual person that is part of both of us. Its so strong sometimes that I almost can’t bear it. I can feel a deep deep connection to something primordial and ancient. There’s no room in there for all the false and poisonous shit about how gross and wrong a fat belly is.
Undoubtedly for some, this narrative would have been very close to the reality of their experience – yet surely for others it holds no more truth than the invention of a happy ending.
Life has changed so much in a year.
The bottom of the map contains a striking illustration of the view of Manhattan as seen from Governors Island, with ships, soldiers, waves and smoke. Brooklyn, or “Brookland,” is a patchwork of farms of different shades, bisected by Flatbush Road.
Dear Free-Range Kids: My father just passed away a few weeks ago. He had a little lollipop tree in his house, that each child who visited got to pick from. It was my children’s favorite.
so i've been really good about exercising this year (haha, ok...last month). but haven't been as great over this last week and i'm definitely starting to feel it.
Really that only happened because technically my long runs both ended up in the same week on the site. The site adds the week Monday-Sunday, where as I tend to view the week Sunday-Saturday. If that were the case then my mileage wouldn't have been so high, but seeing that 31 up in the corner? I feel pretty good about that.
People asking me how I
Also, you may notice that I am very pro-gun and that I actually love my firearms. Many of the posts here will probably reflect that in one way or another and I do believe that firearms and other weapons are very important when prepping. Not only to secure more food and protect yourself, but if all else fails you will have a VERY valuable bartering chip.
Hello, poor little neglected blog.
The letter came with this explanation attached:
I expected they would rush down, but no, they stood looking at me like lost children. I would have left them to it, but I was happy to spend a little time with them.
our living room window, under the clouds
The most difficult part of his being on sick leave is that he has no one to hang out with. Picture it: you are off on vacation for a week with no plans, but you have no one to do anything with. Everyone else is at work during the day, right? The same for H3. All his work friends and other friends are busy during the day while he sits at home, by himself. Bored.
“It accumulates more in bones,” continued Buesseler. “It replaces calcium in your bones or in fish bone. And in fish, in particular, there is a concern of this accumulation. And if you were to eat small fish, as is done commonly more in Japan, then you would accumulate strontium-90 that would then affect your dose through the accumulation in your bone.”
Bull & Bush Pub & Brewery Hail Brau
Also: Life is not perfect and cannot be made so. It’s funny we need to be reminded of this…but we do! — Lenore
05. Poison feat. Realizm (prod. by Sesta)
It’s Ran-Hanuel. What is he doing here?
With Fil-Ams vowing to see her through the finals and Jessica’s exceptional talent, we might just see a Pinay become the next American Idol!
taquitos
I do not want to comment much about what happened after, but if you look at the video below, you can see Anwar making a sign for the deaf for “JUMP OVER” repeatedly (0.9s marked by a yellow square) to Azmin. Azmin acknowledges and instructs an Indian man next to him to remove the police barrier. Nobody won on that day, but democracy was hijacked by democrazy. The biggest losers are the suckers who thought they are idealists, but were merely mules ridden by the likes of Anwar for his political benefit.
It’s available in 5 colours here – pink, fuchsia, red, coral and plum – all with long-lasting synonyms attached. I was instantly drawn to the pink and fuchsia, but I went for the pink as I have plenty of fuchsia already.
I found complacency, that this was just how it was to be, right? I had thought about divorce for about a year, but was frozen by fear of the unknown. I knew there was another woman at several points along the way. My respect, trust, and love withered slowly till they finally died out.
THE BOURNE LEGACY – AUG 3
I hope you all had a wonderful Holiday season and you are looking forward to the New Year with optimism.
“Mike Cabral, assistant chief deputy district attorney, said March 15 that the district attorney’s office had not yet completed its review of the case files—and that a decision on whether to prosecute is likely to come Monday or Tuesday (March 19 or 20). If the decision is made to go forward, the district attorney’s office will notify the suspects by mail, ordering them to appear in court.”
For the past three weeks some gay men have publicly offended, marginalized, and misrepresented transgender issues and individuals. I have written about some of that mess here: Remembering Jorge while Forgetting what Binds Us. People have been at work publicly and behind the scenes to speak directly to the gay men responsible for words and actions that serve to break down community rather than build it.
My goal for this race=1 hr 29 min 34 sec, a pace of 6:50 min/mi! Yesterday I logged my longest run so far, a 6 mile run @ a pace of 6:58 min/mi. While this is 8 seconds off of my goal pace, I'm not worried. Here's why:
Nails - Rebecca Jade Wilson @ Jedroot
Brazil’s consumer prices will rise 5.11 percent next year, according to the median forecast in a Feb. 24 central bank survey of about 100 economists published today, up from the previous week’s estimate of 5.02.
1 cannon
“No help will come.” She mocked. “Only death comes in Winter!” She burst into a fit of laughter and I ran.
Bro stares directly into John Keyes’ eyes and smiles. For a few seconds, everything in the room moves away. A white light breaks like a wave over Bro’s brain, and stops just behind his eyes - a blurred message. And then, just as quickly, it's gone.
flowing recklessly
One day, Cody hands me the Magnadoodle.
I love Frank Sinatra because Daddy loved him first. He used to sing Frank Sinatra to me when I was baby. Every time I hear the song, "The Way You Look Tonight" I can't help but think of my Dad.
I rode Coni on many trail rides put on by our local saddle club, and one of the old timers there told me they were taking bets to see how long I would be able to stay on my horse, see Coni had developed some of her mother's habits, she didn't like the reins held too tight and would shake her head in this little temper tantrum whenever it happened. She never liked to just walk on the trail, she was always jigging, and I didn't know any better than to just let her do it. It didn't matter, Coni was always safe for me to ride and didn't buck me off so I don't know who won the bet...
A Washington DC-area citizens’ civil rights group and the American Civil Liberties Union have launched a publicity and petition campaign against bag searches on the area’s subway system.
(2) Farmworkers under the age of 16 would be prohibited from using electronic, including communication, devices while operating power-driven equipment”;
I'm still going to run, but I want to apply elsewhere the focus and determination required for training for a marathon. I want to put that focus back into my writing.
— Build a defensive perimeter around the two stations. Don’t position yourself around them, because it is likely you will be overwhelmed. If all your team is concentrated around them, with a couple of mortar strikes or in the event of a tank assault, you’re dead meat. If the M-Com stations are inside buildings, don’t barricade yourself inside, because the enemy can destroy and will make them collapse – with you inside.
Schmeichel believes that the best solution for Manchester United is to replace Van Der Sar with the much coveted Pepe Reina; whether a transfer from bitter rivals Liverpool to Old Trafford is feasible however, is another question. Reina, a Euro 2008 and 2010 World Cup winner with Spain, has impressed in the Premier League since his switch from Villareal with Liverpool. He has a wealth of experience in big match scenarios after competing for Liverpool in a successful FA Cup final win over West Ham and an unsuccessful Champions League final against AC Milan.
Seal with name similar to Prime Minister’s found in the physically closest structure to King Solomon’s Temple ever unearthed. (image below)
Now lets party scrappy style. Normally the guests bring presents to the party but we want to share the fun by doing things a bit backwards and providing gifts for you. For a chance at the big gift we have provided a sketch for you to work with. You will also need to check out all the design team blogs and leave them some love as each of them has a party favor for you to collect. Use the sketch and 3 of the party favors on a LO for a chance to win the birthday gift. Share your creation with us
Anyway, in the past year their team has had a few people promoted up and into other departments, but they haven't had any new hires or transfers to take those now empty spots. This means that they're a teensy bit short staffed. Add to that the fact that they switched to entirely new software a month ago that people are still learning... well, things are slower than usual. They had their quarter end last week and apparently it was kinda brutal.
He was a kind soul, her mister right
I'm toying with ideas for the back; at the moment I think I'm going to use some leftover charms to make a big star block. What do you think, should I go with Spirit (there are a few Spirit fabrics in the front), or all Tweet-Tweet (and pretty much all I have left are the polka dots)? OR I could do two stars, one of each. (I like that idea less, because it seems too...symmetrical?) Another alternative was to piece the leftover charms together into a single long row, so be added as a 'stripe' to the back. Ideas?
I realize,
justify the killing of another?
She too is cut from 3/4 inch MDF and then mounted onto a chunk of 2x4.
Well we did it. But, Dan was putting the final coat of paint on our fence an hour before the first car arrived. I was literally greeting guests while he was showering, that’s how close we played it.
I’m heading to a Mexican beach in about nine weeks. This is a good thing. It also means going shirtless. That is a slightly uncomfortable thing. As a guy I’m not particularly vain, but I’ve never been very fond of how I look between the neck and the knees. I’m happy with my calves. I guess the ankles too. The rest not so much. I wouldn’t say I’m exactly fat. Just sort of… squishy around the middle.
The symptoms of prostate cancer rarely show before the disease has progressed, but a simple PSA blood test can serve as an early warning and save men’s lives. But how do you reach men in their late 30s and early 40s, when statistics show they often skip regular physicals and avoid doctor’s offices?
Megellan’s massive engines made the deck hum beneath his feet. He scarcely notice them most of the time, but today was different. Today those engines were carrying him to a place few people were ever forced to go.
As you know, I'm a huge fan of The Hunger Games. The movie was so good! It did not disappoint at all. So even though opening weekend was last week, here's my swatch of Harvest Moon.
Make me as rich as humanly possible.
(This tactic only works however if A. Your female. And B. Your breast are bigger then a size A.)
When Miss C turned 1, it was a Friday. We were going to have a house party for both Miss C and Wee Z on the Saturday so on Miss C's birthday we had a little fairy cake with a candle in it and a trip to the park. On the Saturday, my family and Husband's family came over as well as all of our friends. We borrowed our next door neighbour's trampoline for all the kids at the party to use and thankfully, the weather stayed nice for us.
Yes, the spell, the one the witch in my English class cast on me. Why did she turn me into a beast who hides by day and prowls by night? I'll tell you. I'll tell you how I used to be Kyle Kingsbury, the guy you wished you were, with money, perfect looks, and the perfect life. And then, I'll tell you how I became perfectly . . . beastly. From Amazon US
Multicolored Freeleaf Pads and Multicolor Notebooks. Great, heavy paper. But I don't like writing on these at all. The paper is smooth, but performance otherwise varies a lot by the color of the paper. Sometimes, the paper repels the ink so much it looks like I've tried writing on wax paper; the ink doesn't so much skip as bead up and bubble.
1 1/2 teaspoons grated lime zest
All templates can be used for marking design boxes and filling them in with all kinds of feathers, background fillers, or curved and regular cross hatching designs.
I think HBO has already optioned film rights.
National Center for Missing and Exploited Children.
I’m going to start by saying that this new blogging journey that the CW and I are on is an interesting one. Any blogger, or even most national opinion writers, can sit at their computers and spout. To back up your positions with factual information requires a great deal of time and research. Despite the time-suck the CW and I are determined to stay the course. If every blogger in America did the same we’d probably have better discourse in this country. Alas…
At each of his stops, Lim spoke about Penang’s green credentials. He hoped to initiate exchanges with Parks Victoria that would help support the Penang Botanic Gardens and facilitate a greener and cleaner Penang.
Compact AIT4 videos may take up lower room on your shelf space, whereas the actual improved storage space capability reduces the quantity of videos required for information backups.
He grinned as she turned back to him. "Dystopian's my favorite genre."
These are the things I'm trying to do to not go to that dark place again:
But really, she is so snazzy. When I was a senior in high school, I was still discovering my style. I was just getting into the whole vintage thing, and while people knew that it was the 'look' I was going for, there are certainly some outfits I look back on that make me cringe. Outfits that I was trying to be creative with thrift store finds, but really just probably made me look homeless.
If anyone is feeling inspired, there is a Wiki page called MyCityCuisine that is looking for contributors. The project is creating a resource for travelers looking to sample the best of local cuisines. Check it out at: MyCityCuisine.org
Thanks for stopping by and be sure to enter your tags in the challenge!
yasyātma-buddhiḥ kuṇape tri-dhātuke
Happy flower arranging you all!
hostage of the
Marley: Yes! That chicken is American! Ha ha ha!
Roll
in 2002: Boss Bailey (2 interceptions in 2001).
According to the World malaria report 2011, there were about 216 million cases of malaria (with an uncertainty range of 149 million to 274 million) and an estimated 655 000 deaths in 2010 (with an uncertainty range of 537 000 to 907 000). Malaria mortality rates have fallen by more than 25% globally since 2000, and by 33% in the WHO African Region. Most deaths occur among children living in Africa where a child dies every minute from malaria.
And please pass the link along to anyone you know who would be interested in any of the following:
Geez, Louise.
Our pastor stayed with us and drove us to where our daughter lived. She was working at the hospital and we did not want her to hear the news on television. We asked them not to release the information until we had time to talk with her. We stopped at their farm to tell her husband and to take him with us.
DO YOU HAVE ANY ADVICE FOR ASPIRlNG ENTREPRENEURS WHO WANT TO DO SOMETHlNG IN THE SAME VEIN AS TOMS?
I can understand why this tree on Hadrian’s Wall was featured in the movie Robin Hood: Prince of Thieves (starring Kevin Costner, 1991). The Robin Hood Tree has character, shown to its full advantage amidst a striking landscape with ever-changing weather. We met this attention-grabber while on a three-mile hike along Hadrian’s Wall between Housesteads Roman Fort and Steel Rigg.
“All Summer” by Kid Cudi, Rostam Batmanglij, and Beth Cosentino (26)
The initial shock of not having a phone has been quite dampened today because I’ve not had anywhere to go. I’ve been able to sit at home on my laptop to work, watch tv and tweet/facebook.
Here is something I came up with the day before yesterday. Rice cakes. I made these in the microwave. I expect they would taste better, be crunchier or crispier if baked in a proper oven. Anyhow, the result was pretty tasty (at least to my hungry taste buds), albeit a little chewy.
Some days it just doesn't pay to enter the kitchen. I had the recipe for this bread for about a month before I made it. My first attempt not so successful. The dough went together beautifully. The first proofing, great. The second, no problem. Then Rigby's technology teacher emailed us to let us know about her antics in class, and things went down hill from there. After picking Rigs up from school. (She sent a text stating she was staying for the after school program, despite the fact I was waiting in front of the school for her) I opened a bottle of wine and started to shape the bread into loaves. After rolling out the dough, brushing on butter, and sprinkling with cinnamon and sugar, it was time for the final proofing. Everything was going well. The oven was preheating, I was enjoying my glass of wine, and was busy getting dinner together. Dinner went on the table and I was enjoying my second glass of wine. Once dinner was over and Rigby was doing clean up, I slid the bread into the oven, set a timer, and then took my glass of wine into the living room to hang out with hubby. When I remembered the bread in the oven, it was cremated. To the point the raisins turned to ash in your mouth.
Dad reaches over. Grabs the handle. Lifts it into the air. Joey holds on tight, his legs dangling and kicking the air. Dad shakes the stick, pulls at his fingers, lets Joey fall to the ground.
So why does this matter, this apparent vanity run by a celebrity candidate? Because I can envision a scenario where Roseanne Barr could take enough votes from Obama to cost him some states which would ordinarily be safely blue states, or purple states where it might be really close. Some that come to mind include-Oregon, Washington, Vermont, Minnesota, New Mexico, Colorado, Florida, Virginia, and even the President's home state of Illinois.
I decided to use this race as a training run for next weekend's Kentucky Derby Marathon. My goal was to run my marathon pace and push the last mile. On the whole, my race went well. It was raining, which always makes things a bit tricky, but it builds character, and running in all kinds of elements helps you better prepare for running in those elements during a race. I apparently also drank more water than I thought before the race so had to make a quick pit stop (I hate when that happens, but again, happy it was in a "training run" rather than the marathon). I stopped one additional time to take off my long-sleeve running top. Still, I felt relaxed and I am excited for next week's marathon.
in secret, between the shadow and the soul.
Psalm 1
Today’s post is a reflection on my beliefs:
“I’ll show you...”
What you can not see in this picture, are his arms, wrapped from blood being drawn from them. Yes, they took from both arms. Poor little guy, it took three people to hold him down. All he kept saying was, "it hurts Mommy, it hurts."
BLOSSOMING VISIONS graciously passed this one on to me and I am thrilled because just the award name alone "Lovely Blog" is lovely, much like the gesture :)
We planned on a new imac this past week and just as though we planned it, Apple came out with significant enhancements on a new release on the very day that we had planned to pic one up. I’m now typing from the bluetooth keyboard of a 27″ quad core imac that screams. The previous version was a great machine, but this new imac has 70% more processing power and 300% faster graphics handling. Fabulous for what we do . Comparing it to our retired G4 is to compare two different worlds.
But Stupid Peter was well gone, all the way along Nirab’s Yellow Brick Road. I give up on him then ruminated on Nirab’s powers of persuasion, his stealth and speed and cunning in getting the simple minded to get on his side. And I also begun to wonder had I found our front man in me and Party Time’s Credit Card Fraud scheme…if so, the first stop was getting to see if he were in any financial dif’s one way or another…Maybe a drab, hopeless Christmas and a ominous New Year were beginning to look up, the fortunes flipping, an inversion of fate, as in like Uncle Dudley’s upside down God’s cross stuck into his noggin.
Solution: There is an alphabet soup of laws or regulatory/advisory organizations that rule the SMS marketing land, including CTIA, MMA and CAN-SPAM. If you break the rules, you could have your campaign shut down along with those of marketers using the same short code. Become familiar with the MMA’s Best Practices (PDF), then for good measure, review the CTIA’s Playbook.
The baggage that comes with Nick Griffin has now become too much of a burden. Recent election results tell you that, and how many times have you heard something like “I’d vote for you but that Nick Griffin.” It’s way past the time were we need to up our game, we need someone who is media savvy and not playing catch up and giving us sound bites of how success is just around the corner if we just carry on. We know where this ship is heading and we need a new Captain and quickly.
This was a festival of food, wine, and brew. This was a "farm to fork" event where local producers provided food and local chefs made delicious dishes with it.
Congratulations, Lee! Now is that not fitting?
And then I was just curious enough to see what would happen if I lit them...
I started with a piece of foam board and fabric. Easy peasy. Cut the fabric to fit the size of your foam board and hot glue the fabric to the back of the foam board. Just like you are recovering a chair cushion.
Sadly I won't be able to attend the launch, but please do go, and please buy the booklet. There are some wonderful poems there. More information here.
but is a little forceful in his actions.
The State shall promote the principle of shared responsibility between workers and employers and the preferential use of voluntary modes in settling disputes, including conciliation, and shall enforce their mutual compliance therewith to foster industrial peace.
Purple Yams
Today those who take interest in politics are those with vested interest, those upon the edge or those directing events; the common man cares only for self, a legacy perhaps of the Thatcher years. The right within this country has completely collapsed, the Tories ever waving the flag and worshipping pomp and circumstance altered position, moving to the left whilst the so-called extreme right moved to take up their old ground and indeed in doing so opened themselves up to Zion’s influence. As I write these words there is no nationalists defence, no party truly of the right and nationalism to all intents and purposes lies defeated.
3. In a saute pan, saute the onions, and carrots in olive oil. Add more oil if the veggies should need it. Once the onions are transclucent remove from heat.
A royal wedding often conjures up the image of a lavish feast taking place at the end of a children’s fairytale – where the prince and princess wed each other in an elaborate ceremony that is celebrated by the entire kingdom.
trying hard to be awake
I began to write. What began as an answer for her ended up fulfilling my last dream when SWEET MOON BABY: AN ADOPTION TALE was published. Once it was in print, it turned out to be an answer for many other children. After I read my book at a school, I received my best review of all when an adopted Chinese kindergarten girl whispered to my husband, "I'm the REAL Sweet Moon Baby." I suddenly understood how well the tale worked. It held powerful possibilities for children other than mine. Many of the truest things in our lives begin with our imaginations.
Tom: Yeah. Kick off, Patriots ball on the 20 yard line – 57 seconds to go 80 yards.
I'm sure there is something else that I can add but I don't want to make too many rules. Whatever you donate will be used. Sometimes I've received blocks that are a different size or theme and I work with them and often make more to match before putting them together. I'm going to avoid having quilts that are too brown and which will remind them of floodwaters, as with the bushfire quilts I avoided using predominantly red and black for the quilts, but apart from that have fun and use up your scraps. The quilts will be warm and sturdy and will convey the thoughts and good wishes of you all to wrap them in a warm hug from all of us. I write " A hug from Oz Comfort Quilts" on the label.
I just returned from the Erma Bombeck Writers Workshop so you’ll have to excuse me if my soapbox is a smidgen too big today.
My hair is fabulous.
“No. I got lost, so I stopped to ask a police officer for help. He is a really nice person, and I told him all about you, so he just wanted to meet you and say hi.”
Though it might seem odd to some paruretics, I am glad that I have paruresis. Through my recovery process I have experienced a completely different point of view than I was used to, and I am now able to look at the world with open eyes. I see all of the the suffering around the world; the death, disease, murder, starvation, and utter inhumanity. Though my condition decisively falls short of the innumerable amount of such suffering, it has awakened me to a much greater truth.
"That's it" I said to Fred, ignoring my friends' advice - "I have wanted to go to the Ivy for over fifteen years, and now is the time". And so the two of us set off across Hungerford Bridge for the 15 or so minute walk towards the enigmatic Ivy.
Is this show going to be a one time deal, or are there any other plans for the band to stay together in the future? May be are you recording something new?
PS: Feeling screwed up today…
That depends…Are we talking original Night of the Living Dead zombies (which shuffle) or are we talking crazy fast zombies like in I Am Legend or 28 Days Later? Are all dead bodies reanimated or just people who have been bitten? Are there zombie cats like in Misfits? Have the werewolves had breakfast?
Mamba has NOT yet been restored. This is very important to make clear. The print we will show at Cinefest is a work in progress, straight out of the can. The picture elements are far from perfect and the soundtrack is noisy, still this doesn't hide the fact that the nitrate print is in very good condition. There is no apparent damage or anything apart from the usual scratches, uneven lightning and some loose splices. The digital print was made out of curiosity and the sole purpose with it is to be able to show this believed long lost film to the world.
This is the meat of the research. As so often, the study has been press released before publication so we cannot see which statistical tricks Pell has employed, but we can use the official NHS records to see how her claims stand up. The data are available here.
And never return.
Thai-born Suchada Goodier, 44, owner of a Thai restaurant on the Kingsway, said she was walking on the street when she was attacked. The group then started bashing her car. “What have I done?” she said. “I have done nothing.”
My wish for you
“Sounds good to me.”
Some idea of what it is like to be on the receiving end of this ideological battering can be gleaned from an extract, taken from Vasiliy Grossman’s Everything Flows. A former party activist looks back at collectivization and the media assault on the kulaks, the “enemies of the people”:
Bake for 15 minutes, then reduce heat to 300 and bake for an additional 5 minutes. At this point, place foil around the edges of your crust to keep it nice and brown, but not crispy and burnt. Bake for another 35-40 minutes.
The Constitutional Court also briefly discussed possibility of applying competition law, Art. 101 and Art. 102 TFEU, pointing to recent decision in Football Association Premier League C-403/08 and Karen Murphy C-429/08. Lets see what is now going to happen on City Court in Prague. Huťko (with help of his friends & readers) will monitor the case closely.
One of the reasons discussing these things is important, and why I appreciated ExZanian's post, is because the current Marxist regime is happily doing what Marxist regimes are best at: rewriting history to suit their own twisted interpretation of history. Just as Stalin did in the 1920s and 30s, good communists have to see resistance to their ideals as part of Marx's 'last ditch' defence of Capitalism by the capitalists, as "predicted" back in the 1800s. And, as good Marxists, there's no such thing as history for them anyway, they are free to play about with it
I had hoped to get this posted before Shemini Atzeret, in time for Shabbat Bereshit. But even though Shabbat Bereshit has come and gone, there is a fascinating subject in last weeks Parasha that I would like to discuss.
Last weekend we did celebrate my parents 38th anniversary! My parents have been married 38 years and Kirk’s parents have been married 39 years. We have 77 years of wonderful examples of how we want to live our lives. Thank you parents for giving us that.
After all, truly living out the Christian life requires a total confidence in Our Father who provides and cares for us as His children. As a good friend recently warned me, “You shouldn’t worry, because God told you not to!” He was thinking of Luke 12:22-26, where Christ tells his disciples point-blank to stop worrying, because their anxiety over daily cares does them absolutely no good: “Therefore I tell you, do not be anxious about your life . . . Consider the ravens: they neither sow nor reap, they have neither storehouse nor barn, and yet God feeds them. Of how much more value are you than the birds! And which of you by being anxious can add a cubit to his span of life? If then you are not able to do as small a thing as that, why are you anxious about the rest?”
Thank you. It basically started with the term “old soul”, meaning someone who is wise beyond their years. I decided that someone who had a bunch of dead people’s spirits living inside him might have reason to be considered an old soul. It was something that I didn't think had been done before, or at least if it had been, wasn't too common, and it just went from there.
Chill the mixture thoroughly in the refrigerator. Once the mixture is cold, taste it and grate in more nutmeg if you wish. Freeze in your ice cream maker according to the manufacturer’s instructions.
Speaker: David Hofferberth, Service Performance Insight
Tue 9 June: 10:00 – 19:00
Don Graham is a writer for the International Mission Board.
I'm stilllllll stuck on using this yellow, red, aqua combo....but avoided rounding the corner of my card today! :) I used the fake stitching line in aqua from ClearSnap on the white card stock and on my Spellbinders Page Maps label. I really can't sew to save my life, so, this is about as close as I am going to get to the real deal! ;) The heart is the from the July set, Hello Friend (Although I do believe there are other hearts similar to this size in another set as well) and is covered with stickles. I finished my card off with some bling from Want2Scrap.
2) Losing my way
But, sometimes I find myself wishing too much.
Hey Suzan. Thanks for taking the time out to talk to me about your new film, ‘The Devil Inside’.
i will add this card to these other challenges,
I make no claims for the quality of my own stuff I've put on the web, but I like think that I've given you, the readers, some quality content for your investment of time. I also like to think that I have successfully avoided the self-delusion that just because something can be done, that I can do it. Nothing wrong with playing to your strengths.
Pender St & Burrard St – 11:55am
Suzanne used a foam wreath form, but I didn't have one of those. I did have one of the green wire forms, so.........
The reason why this Haiku is written here in Chaya-machi is that the town used to be a field where plenty of rape flowers flourished in this season around the beginning of Meiji era (1868～1912）.
Though his other four uncles have homes of their own, they are almost always at their mother’s house talking business. And Janine is fully aware of what her sons do and doesn’t seem to care how bad they are as long as her family stays together and are safe. But they are anything but safe when the police drug force have been out of control lately by taking the law into their own hands and murdering several known drug dealers. Now the family has to lay low and watch each others backs when they don’t know who will be next, and this couldn’t be a worse time for Jay to be reunited with his family when they see him as young and impressionable which makes him a liability to their safety if the cops ever managed to pressure him for information. But the only person the family seems to listen to is Barry (Joel Edgerton) who they all call Baz, he is the level headed voice of reason and his feared reputation keeps them all in line and he won’t let anything happen to Jay. But when the cops shoot him while he’s unarmed and simply sitting in his car at the grocery store the family’s sense of unity quickly starts to unravel. After Baz dies his brother Pope (Barry Mendelsohn) steps up to take control, but he is the complete opposite of his brother and becomes a loose cannon when he wants revenge against the police. Pope tells Jay to steal a car and bring it to the house of his uncle Darren (Luke Ford), While Jay stays at Darren’s house his three uncles take the car to a suburban neighborhood and leave it parked in the street while they wait for the police to show up and investigate. Once a squad car arrives two cops search the car and the three of them shoot both officers, but the next day they are all arrested. And this is where the family becomes very nervous about having Jay around because they aren’t convinced he can hold up under the pressure, and the fact that he spends most of his time with his girlfriend Nicky (Laura Wheelwright) they think he might be telling her things about the family.
Has push come to shove?
We have three separate police inquiries — Elveden, Weeting and Tuleta.
April- it was full of trying new things (like Singletons restaurant and hummus), Easter sunrise service with Steven's family, work, work, work, and more work, cleaning, buying some pretty dresses, and making lots more lists. All in all, it was a pretty good month and I feel like it flew by.
Our Apaches and Cobras are hunting you down,
5.Uncle Dave Macon And Fruit Jar Drinkers / Walking In Sunlight
Sorry it has been a little bit since my last post. I have been working very hard with my students and it was getting quite exhausting as we patiently awaited the arrival of Spring Break! It has now arrived, well actually it arrived a few days ago, but I've been a busy bee in those few days. :) I have so many projects that I have worked on over the past few weeks, that I finally have time to blog about! So look for those throughout the week.
Naida seemed to have no intention of slowing down. They had plenty of motivation to keep moving and the fog served to both unnerve them and provide visual protection. The large group of soldiers would be heard if they approached in any form of haste.
After we got back to our room, we realized we forgot the bag with the diapers and pullups...I had 2 diapers left for Madelyn at that point and no pull up for Brody. Oops! So, Heath went to Walmart in the pouring rain while the kids and I stayed back and watched a movie and stayed up waiting for him.
As with everything, I’ll do my best, but I make no promises. Also as always, if there’s a particular topic you have in mind, send it on!! I’m absolutely NOT adverse to deep topics! Those will DEFINITELY still make an appearance. But they won’t be an everyday
The food was amazing...
She cited the 515 rapes, 414 aggravated sexual assaults and 349 forcible sodomies documented by just the Criminal Investigation Command in 2011.
video synopsis on adult romance ebooks by: Cherry A.
July 1 – Millwoods Celebrates Canada Day
Peanut Butter Cupcakes
We recently started supplementing with formula so I have a couple of empty, good sized cans at my disposal. I simply picked a scrapbooking paper that I liked, measured the height of the can and cut my paper to fit. I used a bit of Elmer's school glue at the ends to keep it in place then smudged a little bit of glue over the raw edge of the paper to seal it. Ta-da!
What we didn’t realize yet was that the USSR’s death throes would deliver us plenty of both. There we were, the terminally naïve, catapulting unprepared into a vast, dying empire, a week after a coup that launched the ill-fated, wild-West era of Yeltsin and his kleptocrat cronies. In four months we would board a westbound train for home, and the Soviet Union would cease to exist. We’d bumbled into a cataclysm, its turbulent winds electrifying but potentially destructive. Riding the bipolar wave of anxiety and exultation that accompanied all that turbulence exerted a powerful hold on us, in a way a semester in Paris never could. Moscow was dangerously addictive.
Inspired by Yvonne's memorabilia and her diary, he starts writing instead an impressionistic, sensitive and personal novel about her, covering more than three decades. Mesmerized by her personality, he decides to go about it by focusing on the changes in her character, on her way of thinking, on her inner life. He decides to place the narrative point of view squarely on her, and crafts many parts in first voice or even in stream-of-consciousness fashion to render her as faithfully as possible.
Me: I will NEVER have that problem! (Even though I am doing my morning workouts…I doubt the booty will change…I just know, and I am okay with it)
Pat: Five years.
They are the result of ionised solar particles becoming imprisoned by Earth’s magnetic field, exciting the gases in the atmosphere and emitting bursts of energy in the form of light.
I also see that Nick is intending to write a major piece on his plans for the next three years. It’ll be interesting to see how much of this needs Nick Griffin to implement it and how much could be done by a new leader. More on this as and when.
All staff and students from the University of Manchester and other research institutes are invited to attend the first Manchester Life Sciences PhD Conference. This is an interdisciplinary conference for PhD students, by PhD students.
Dos Santos, who was men's magazine FHM model of the year in 2011, has since deleted the post. FHM disowned her and stripped of her Modelbook 2011 title. One of her sponsors, QuickTrim, which makes weight-loss products, dropped her. Hundreds of people sent messages on Twitter expressing their dismay.
8:15-9:15 Take first Intermediate 1 lesson. Loved it. (It's salsa-- what's not to love?!)
Not surprisingly, dogs were the first to join the humans, estimated to have begun 32,000 years ago, followed by goats, sheep, and pigs, around 12,000 to 10,000 years past. Cats were domesticated in the Fertile Crescent about 9,000 years ago and were venerated by the ancient Egyptians. The horse transformed our history, beginning around 6,000 years ago in Eurasia.
If a team simply want a hydraulic system to create one suspension effect, then they can rig up a basic system based on one of these patterns. However, with a valve system connecting in the centre of the pipes, then a single pair of hydraulic units and would be able to control both heave and roll stiffness. Such a system would not need external pressurisation or any control software to operate the valve block.
DEFEAT BUT IN VICTORY, IN JESUS CHRIST NAME, AMEN!
It is intimidating, to say the least, to walk into such a place and feel secure. It would be quite easy to get lost in the crowd. But that’s not what we’re longing for. We want and need a place to serve, and we need acceptance and relationships. The only way any of those things is going to happen is if we step out on a limb.
Santa Claus Is Coming To Town 4:53
If one seeks the blessings of the Lord he must accept the will & leading of the Lord. It is a sad state when one who lives in sin suddenly prays out of need and expects God to answer that prayer. He then has the audacity so as to say, “God does not care for him”, or worse yet, “there is no God.”
I paid for that mistake. I paid dearly for that mistake. I paid by being barred from the workplace. I paid by being declared a disturbance in the workplace. I paid by being told that a unanimous vote was taken that said I was to have no contact of any kind with anyone that I worked with. I paid with 13 weeks of medical leave in November, December and January of 2010 and 2011. I paid by being forced to undergo a battery of psychological tests to determine if I was able to return to work. I paid by having to undergo a security clearance review to determine if I was a risk to the security of my country. I paid by having all the friends I had made in 13 years of work for a customer shut me out of their existence. Permanently.
1 leek chopped
Also, sometimes when I travel it creates easy things-to-do lists.
God is the bodyguard to those who speak from the heart and he’ll bless them with knowledge and understanding.
Council Speaker Christine Quinn and City Councilman Julissa Ferreras (D-Jackson Heights) have greenlighted $20,000 worth of research hoping to develop an easy way for folks to report forceful flirtation and other forms of street harassment, the Daily News has learned.
I'm actually just back from Brussels, and didn't get the time to go beer shopping today, so as Lew demanded, I'm about to open a Rauchbier. The Schlenkerla Weissbier. Prost!
Today, when I accidentally dropped an inexpensive jug, Bev's consoling words were...'You are dead meat if it's smashed'. No hug, no sympathy, no warmth. Okay, I know I shouldn't have accommodated that thought. It just popped into my mind...as they do.
With the result that the operational military map on the board showed more of ‘Green’ pins all over the area than the ‘Red’ pins depicting the area under Mukti Bahini control. Whereas the map should have been clustered with the Red pins. The GHQ team returned satisfied about all being hunky-dory in East Pakistan. Similar ‘Sab Achha’ reports kept ema nating from various sectors and parts of East Pakistan to West Pakistan, till the water passed over the head.
So when I started working for a government agency that required everyone to have some sort of snow duty almost 2 years ago, I did not know what I was getting myself into. In fact, last year didn’t help this either as it snowed like once in the 2008-2009 winter season and that was a punk type snow. At least in comparison to the snow monsoons we’ve seen this winter.
Sigler said, “It was once in a lifetime, and something I won’t forget.”
And so, being one with her in this journey (and being the root cause of all her gravities), we (as a department) decided to help her with all her necessities.
If race plays a part in athletics then why is the best high jumper in America White and almost 6 feet tall named Jesse Williams 7′ 9 1/4″ ( white men can’t jump, remember?)? The record is held by a Cuban 7′ 11″. Why was the best 110 Meter high hurdles a few years back from China named Liu Xiang ( Asians can only do math, right?)? Who was the first high school kid to run a mile under 4 minutes? Jim Ryan ( white). Who is one of the worlds best 400 meter runner ? Jeremy Warner ( white). Who is one of the best golfers of all time ( a white sport for the most part)? Tiger Woods ( Bi Racial). Who scored the winning goal in Hockey ( mostly white sport) against Boston last week? Joel Ward ( African-American) My point is that yes there are a lot of black / African-Americans in sports, but their skin color has nothing to do with how good they are. It has to do with hard work and dedication. A few olympics back, a greek lady won the 100 meters and a greek man won the 200 meters. If race plays a role in running, then who will win a 10 mile race between a Jamaican and a Kenyan? They both are black, so there should be a tie ( I have yet to see a fast Jamaican over 400 meters and a fast Kenyan under 800 meters). If the theory of race is true. Because the same race should be of equal ability, right? Some of my Jamaican friends can not run over 300 yards without passing out , yet they are very intelligent .
'Spring Is In The Air' & there is also a combined challenge which is......
14. American Music
The best time to hit this dog park is Yappy Hour, which is in the early evening when our people get home from work. After being cooped up all day, sometimes things get a little weird, so you have to keep your wits about you.
We packed and mailed two boxes for him yesterday. Lots of good stuff like lip balm in the tubes, and sunscreen and Oreos and Bugles and Skittles and Swedish Fish and a Nerf Basketball hoop set, a paperback book from Sam (although I do wonder if, "Blackhawk Down" is a good choice...), lots of Kool-Aid and lemonade packets to put in the waterbottles, wipes, and a few small towels.
So, with Reed in the lead and me following only to take pictures and keep him from getting run over, he stops at another neighbor's who is out cutting his grass. Reed told him what he was doing and the guy was nice but went back to cutting his grass. Reed approached him again and the guy stopped again. This time he turned the mower off and I heard Reed say, "Aren't you going to let me in?" Embarassed, I kind of excused us and suggested that we visit another neighbor out working in his yard.
With all that is going on in health care, now we have something new to worry about.
Renee Shilling:
From 1960′s Paris to present-day Montreal comes an epic love story. It is somber, troubling and luminous all at once and yet filled with hope. Coloured with hues of fantasy and bathed in a surrealistic light, Café de Flore tells the story of the intertwining destinies of Jacqueline (Vanessa Paradis), a young Parisian mother of a special child, Antoine (Kevin Parent), a Montreal DJ, and the women in his life. What binds them all is love – troubling, clumsy, imperfect, unattainable and ultimately human.
Name: Echoing Green
“Keep your tongue from Evil” Psalm 34:13
Nancie
I’m glad that spending most of my days garbed in jeans and a T-shirt just like my infant son makes me a thorn in the side of sphincter-lipped scolds like George Will. Let them choke on their dull, grey notions of maturity and propriety – plum-dumb commode humor has sustained me through far too much to give up on it now.
6 tbsp mayonnaise
Please tell us in the comment section. We all need any help we can get.
Today I am really inspired for the weather, at this moment here is -20°C!!!!!!!! It was snowing the last two days and the temperature droped more than 15 degrees (on Sat. it was only -5°C) and I need a break from doing Christmas card (although I still need to do a few)
GefenPRO 10×4 DVI DL Matrix
My relationship with my children has been like a roller coaster ride with too many dips to count. With no hope in my life I probably would have ended it all a long time ago. I realize death is a terrible thing for anyone to experience, but I think having living children that reject you ranks high on the list of sorrows too. I am their mother though and mothers shouldn’t ever lose hope for their children.
Sun Gem-Moon Sag is an Air-Fire combo, the ‘live wire’ of combos all full of exciting, visionary ideas which are communicated with zeal. Bombast and bluster are a caution for Air-Fire for it tends to get carried away with its own rhetoric when it may be compared to a hot-air balloon.
They tried to do that.
Which is more important, to accomplish a task successfully, or to realise it is inessential before you start?
I've been there. I've suffered with PPD. And the reason this post is the way it is, is because those posts on other blogs that were all "Everything is puppies & rainbows, & unicorns that fart fairy dust" were not helpful to me when I was still recovering. They were just the opposite. I am so happy for anyone who has overcome PPD, because I know how horrible it is. I know the way it feels to sob on your shower floor while the water pounds down on you because your baby is crying & you need to have a minute where you can't hear him so that you can calm yourself. But reading those "I'm better & life rocks!" posts was so difficult.
The reason why this devotional stood out to me was because it set my heart right for the next week. My daughter got sick, which meant one of us had to take a day off from work. (It's quite challenging as a teacher to take a "sick day" because you can't just call in sick, you have to write a full day's worth of subplans.) Then my husband and I both got sick from our daughter. This was all very bad timing on the eve of running our first 1/2 marathon.
Most people love Wednesdays and Fridays. OK, so maybe they merely like Wednesdays in the same way they liked the high school English teacher who wore jeans and regularly interjected words like ‘cool,’ ‘sweet,’ and ‘rad’ into his lectures. Wednesdays are different. It’s a day that stands for something. Sandwiched between three other naggy little days that are constantly demanding productive achievement, Wednesday springs from its seat and proclaims, “You can DO it!” It’s like carrot cake. Better than marshmallow jello, banana pudding, and pumpkin pie, but still not quite your favorite.
The market is my love. Last week I bought 2 large square punnets of Strawberries for £1.50. They’ve been eaten. Oh yes.
So I am not very good when it comes to new years resolutions, so I often just come up with things I would like to achieve. One is to be better with our finances and actually save money for a change! As always I want to loose more weight and get fit and healthy! Last year I started the year weighing 80.6 Kg. I finished the year weighing 73.6kg and put on about a kilo over new year and now weigh 74.5kg. I basically was just eating and drinking whatever I wanted and to be honest I was left feeling more than uncomfortable on more than one occasion! My lowest weight I have recorded is 71.5kg which was on the 13th December. Ideally I would love to get down to 70kg. Which brings me to my next challenge!
Ian
The fossil, which is the most complete so far found of the species, have been outlined by two scientists from the University of Alberta in the Journal of Vertebrate Paleontology. The species, which had a huge symmetrical tail, which is very different to any other coelacanths, has been placed in its own family. The fossil was found on the sloped of the Hart Ranges of the Canadian Rockies, in Wapiti Lake Provincial Park, British Columbia. The fish swam to the west of the Pangaea supercontinent.
Ahem. Using Europe as a boyfriend buffet ASIDE, I am very much enjoying my stay in Belgrade, but a lack of variety in vegan options has led me to eat more or less the same thing day in and day out. As you can imagine, this does not make for very interesting blog posts, however, feast your eyes on THIS:
Don’t listen to your feelings! The truth is, your first novel probably won’t land you on the NYT bestseller list, but that doesn’t mean you are a hopeless amateur. You have as much potential as any other writer, as long as you choose to make the most of you.
The young boy has the bat.
To enter your Little Diva:
is known as the place to taste many rare and not-often-seen-on-tap
I made these sad looking cupcake bears.
On Monday 14 February 2011, some two days after the Sowetan first broke the news about the DA's action, Majavu gave an interview to the website ‘themediaonline.co.za'. That interview contained within it the following quote from Majavu: "I too am guilty of once taking Ferial Haffajee off the Samwu press list for two weeks! She was then an associate editor at the Financial Mail and her publication had run a profile on the Samwu general secretary where they superimposed a viking's hat onto his head. It was childish and when she asked to be put back on, I did so."
Here are the studies.
I'm thrilled that we're having Spring-like weather here in Richmond, VA, USA! (Actually, we just finished having a couple of Summer-like days! Yikes...too early in the year for THAT kind of nonsense!! hehe!) The grass is greening up, the trees are leafing out, and tulips are starting to pop up all over the place!! So, this challenge is perfectly timed, I must say! And, YIKES! Have you visited 7 Kids College Fund lately?! There are so many fabulous new stamps including Elizabeth Bell, Sylvia Zet, and coming soon . . . Nellie Snellen Stamps! Wheetwhoo! I can't wait! My credit card is trembling! (So is my sweet hubby! Trembling, that is! LOL!) OK . . . on to my "Springy" DT project . . .
Freja and I were barely out of the minivan when we encountered a lovely woman trying to find a good place to relocate a sweet little turtle that had wandered onto the nearby (very busy) road. She was pressed for time, but was determined to find a safe place for this rogue traveler, so Freja and I happily volunteered to be turtle rescuers for the afternoon. He was very shy, but after he had been undisturbed for a while on the river bank, he did poke his little nose out of his shell and begin to explore the environment around him just a bit. There was ample water and mud and shelter for our new reptile friend, so I’m hopeful he is adjusting well to his new neighborhood. We wish him all the best!
1 promising
And yet, by strictly numerical measures, Obama at this point is doing better than Bush… so somebody should point this out to “Mr. Business”.
2) a shoot with a seed-hat
The examples listed in the FastCompany article show that people actually become more loyal to the company when they know that their employer trusts them to make the right choice. In a study conducted by CareerBuilder.com, among 5600 employees, 3 in 10 said they will be spending some time during their vacation doing work stuff and 30 percent reported that they will be in touch with their office during their vacation time.
Set in a rising bowl and allow to rise until double the size. If using active dry yeast this will be about 2 hrs. But if you are using instant yeast, it could be as less as 40 minutes. Check instructions on the yeast packet.
Everyone do it do it say! Do it do it hey!
From the publisher:
Not together! Oh God, not together.
This was a tough book for me to get into initially, I have to admit, but once I finally got into it, it was definitely a page turner. I found myself absolutely hating the main character right off the bat. See, I'm a little biased because, while I know that the Civil War was not black and white and there were good and bad guys on both sides, my family were die hard abolitionists. So hearing the main character rant about how much she hated Yankees and Abolitionists was a bit unnerving to me. However, as I moved on I found myself not so much relating to Belle, but understanding her a bit more. Where she grew up, slaves were treated quite well, she did not know just how abused plantation slaves were and therefore did not fully understand the evil of the institution. Also, the only experiences she'd had early on with "Yankee's" (northerners) were bad, so I was able to more understand her blind hatred. It freaked me out that she was able to use the people around her so easily, but I guess that is what made her a good spy. Again, I still couldn't relate to her, but I started to respect her in some ways. She was a very brave character, and while I don't know how much of the book was fact or fiction, I found her to be very entertaining to read about. As far as the writing goes, the narration was pretty dang smooth and the pacing was good. I felt the love scenes were very sudden and abrupt, almost cold, and therefore didn't appeal to me, but that was just personal preference. All in all I felt the book was quite solid, and I am left with a considerable interest in the continuation of Belle's story in later books in the series. 3, Find a Used Book Store
Your number this month - 86
volcanic eruptions, lake side rising tides and riverine floods of transformational fervor are about to over run the pig sty that was built over our home by hogs unperturbed by filth?
Note the caveats 'understands', 'initial ballistics tests' and 'suggested'. In current circumstances statements like that need to be backed up with evidence in triplicate. I look forward to The Guardian showing us the final ballistics report but I shall not hold my breath. We'll see.
Unveiling of The Wave, an art and media installation.
Back to work today. Maybe today after work I'll actually sew some fabric together. All weekend the machine was brought to my spot on the couch and each night it went back untouched. Yeesh.
Of course, in the last couple of years, TV has changed from working on an easy to summarize Spring/Fall schedule to having shows appear almost at random. This really undermines the very idea of a “season,” so I’m including a show or two from the end of 2009 as well.
One morning, he fell asleep (yet again) in Mr. Swartz’ class. After the yardstick-on-the-desk trick woke him up, Mr. Swartz laid the yardstick down between his widespread feet and proceeded to read him the riot act.
Okay, you start your own animation and entertainment empire, design, build and launch an utterly new type of theme park against all odds and amass armfuls of Academy Awards, all while keeping the whole enterprise moving and afloat somehow - then you can wear any mustache you want.
Now onto this week's challenge. Lattice .... this week we are going to include lattice in some form on our cards. Here are a few ideas to get you started ... lattice using your circuit machine, dies, embossed lattice using scor-pal; Lattice Punches; Designer paper that has lattice pattern, lattice background stamps or image stamps that include lattice on them; etc.
We have this on-going friendly battle when it comes to cooking times and what ‘done’ means. To Scotty, it’s a slightly undercooked cookie, soft gooey cheese on pizza, and not really toasted crust. Whereas for me, it’s a chewy crispy cookie, nicely golden cheese on pizza & crispy golden crust. So where is the happy medium? I say, let’s just agree I’m right.
Position: Catcher
Tickets are $50 per person and can be purchased by calling Annette Basey at 752-8799.
They say timing is everything, after all. Well, no, it’s not everything. Desire. Want. Chemistry and connection. There are so many inexplicables (yes I just made a new noun) about why some relationships are successful and others not. My favorite way to define a relationship as a success — if both parties involved are in agreement. If we both feel the same way about each other and want the same things for this moment, we are a success (for now).
Does anyone else take issues with runners who seem to dress inappropriately? Fair play if you are overweight and are doing something about it by running, my hat goes off to you. But repeatedly it is the ladies who seem to fail to grasp the concept of clothing that isn’t restricting when you run. Even the skinny ones. Yes, no-one is perfect, but I don’t see men running in tiny shorts that are being eaten by their bums (if they are, it’s usually for charity).
showering on to anyone naked;
The only thing I have said on the issue is that instead of going to the trouble of importing it why not just make it up here. Fuck, the internet says it’s a piece of piss. Chemicals, some tubing, some other chemicals….but no….Party Time says the risks are too great, both in ‘law’ risky, and in ‘could-kill-yourself’ risky, as it is a dangerous game making Crystal. Very Explosive.
The dove was giving me coyly sidelong glances
The characters are colorful and amusing, especially Bubbles with his antiquated street hustler argot. Much of the dialogue seems forced and unnatural, though, at least to modern ears. Still, that's easy enough to get accustomed to after a few dozen pages. My only real qualm with the body of the story is that a certain political scheme of Blizzard's, which seems as if it is building into a major plot point, is never brought to fruition, turning it into unneeded padding.
Hi Ladies! Yes, it's me, Kirby! You are all probably wondering where I've been, and the truth is, I've just been busy and have had to put blogging to the side for a little bit. I'll bring you up to date on what has been going on with me.
Gramm, an outspoken conservative who opposes the rules, last year managed to kill a similar bill that would have overhauled the community lending laws. The White House insisted that banks be required to have a strong track record in local loan-making as a condition for being allowed to expand into other financial activities.
One guy many problems.
Sunday Morning: Seminar: TBC
When a analyst arrangement a bold 10/10, he is not claiming the bold is in actuality perfect. Rather, he is asserting that, from his experience, the game's abstruse blemishes are so dispersed and minute that they do not decidedly affect the aloft of the all-embracing experience. A 10/10 can aswell betoken that, admitting advancements in technology, years from now the analyst may still acquisition the aloft bulk of amusement in the game.
The last one for this week is a shot from two years ago. Taken along the Kancamagus Highway in the White Mountain National Forest in New Hampshire.
imminent drop. And we can confirm that while ‘Valtari’ is quite a departure from
Reading this has only scratched the surface of why I hunt. Most of it words can not explain. If you want to better understand why I hunt, why hunters hunt, you will just have to go and experience hunting for yourself. Even then I can't promise you will get it.
“And we’ve got to make sure that we’ve got a tax system that is actually fair. Part of that is something I call the Buffett Rule. It’s very simple: If you are making more than $1 million a year — I’m not saying you have $1 million, I’m saying you’re making $1 million every year — then you shouldn’t pay a lower rate than your secretary. That’s a pretty simple proposition.”
Also a tagline, a logo, and other design sundry. This will be most people’s first impression of this, so it has to send the right message and have the right feel. Done well, we can raise awareness and have a great turnout.
Oh (got the devil on his side)
With Argento's trademark visual style, linked with one of his more coherent plots, Tenebrae follows a writer who arrives to Rome only to find somebody is using his novels as the inspiration (and, occasionally, the means) of committing murder. As the death toll mounts the police are ever baffled, and the writer becomes more closely linked to the case than is comfortable.
So, with that context in place, here’s a list of what I believe young entrepreneurs have in their DNA:
Hock Seng’s an interesting case because he doesn’t quite conform to the cultural model that Hofstede’s laid out for him. He’s very self-involved, not caring about those around him or the desperate situation the world’s in (IDV). He wants what’s his and he wants it now. At first glance, this should put his individualism off the charts. This is almost the exact opposite of the typical Chinese culture which places much emphasis on the wellbeing of the group over the individual. Except, from Hock Seng’s perspective, he’s not part of a group. His family were all killed and he fled his home country and culture to Thailand where he’s treated as a second-class citizen. As far as Hock-Seng’s concerned, the people around him aren’t part of his group and everyone who was is now dead or so far removed from him that they might as well be. So looking after himself is the only option left. This feeds in to his tendency to want to achieve and be the best in order to put himself in the best position he can for survival (MAS). He’s prepared to take the risk of stealing and taking off with his bounty but he’s also willing to bide his time, waiting for the opportune moment (UAI, LTO). He won’t do anything stupid in order to speed up the process but neither is he likely to pass up an opportunity simply because it’s a bit risky. He’s the perfect schemer.
Autumn has been very mild so far ---indeed we have had a week of quite warm temperatures.
bloody granite,
This book was fantastic to read because of Edward. You were shown a side of Edward with Donna and the kids. You didn’t know about, don’t know if it will work but I am cheering for a semi happy ending with this group.
Okay then! All six people who read this blog and already know how to dye your own hair, hold onto your pants...
A year ago, Argentina became the first country in Latin America to grant same-sex couples full marriage rights. Before this year is over, the Argentinean congress might very well pass a groundbreaking transgender-rights law extending health care protections to transgender individuals and making it easier for trans folk to change their ID’s to better reflect their gender identity without requiring proof of gender reassignment surgery.
Call Collect...Art Linkletter
Jennifer Rock, Best Buy, is responsible for internal communication and finds social media invaluable for managing communications in both directions for thousands of employees. Challenges have included concerns of HR, legal and executives. One creative answer was a spreadsheet anticipating all possible *&!@ kinds of words and developing alternative phrases to capture the meaning without the actual *&!@. She emphasized that she might have gone through a more strategic approach given what she has learned now, but that there is a great deal to be said to have learned by doing.
We ask you to keep her in your thoughts and prayers, and to give strength to those surrounding her through this tough time.
Sasu Ripatti, who has been recording solo electronic music as Vladislav Delay for some time now, here tries something different by assembling a live band to play a largely acoustic set that sounds a bit like a jazz band doing dark ambient. Ripatti himself plays drums, Lucio Capece contributes howls and long whistling tones on soprano sax and bass clarinet, Derek Shirley drives the music along with throbbing double bass, and Mika Vainio adds the only electronic contributions. The music is dark and sinister, creeping along at a plodding pace like a movie monster inexorably pursuing its prey. Ripatti's percussion is largely sparse, providing a slow rhythmic underpinning with tinkling cymbals, while the other musicians craft grim soundscapes from electronic noise, bassy rumble and the eerie sounds of Capece's horns, sometimes processed and blurred, sometimes play acoustically with just his breath whistling through the instrument, not quite sounding a note. The entire album is great, but the clear highlight is the 12-minute "Santa Teresa," a foreboding death march that, I'd like to think, provides a tribute through its title and its haunting atmosphere to the fictional and violent Mexican city of Roberto Bolaño's epic novel 2666. [buy]
There's a slight change in our challenge prize beginning today and for future challenges. Unless it's a special occasion or event, one lucky person will get to pick two digis from Sassy Cheryl's shop. We reserve the right to give away a whole lot more for those special events that we have from time to time (Sassy Cheryl is one very generous lady!).
Nearly a year ago I set up an account for E on MyJobChart.com. This fabulous free resource let's you create online job charts for each child and assign each job a point value. Kids login to fill out their job charts and then spend, save, or share (donate) their accumulated points. Rewards can be anything you want - screen time, fun activities, or tangible rewards like toys.
father and exposed to war strategies and societal information no one can
Merrick is so fun, I can't believe he's one already and am incredibly grateful to be his mom. I get excited thinking about our years to come, getting to know him as he grows, and watching his relationship with Weston. They are pretty incredible!
Put aside what you think of Komen, Gates, ALEC, or PCCC for a moment. This is not about any of these organizations per se. It is about public pressure, organized and otherwise, on nonprofits and foundations, about their decision making. It is about making decisions that will be challenged, and striking the right balance between legitimate board governance and respecting people's right to agree or disagree with you.
I do not think the disciples were making a mockery of prayer by praying for something which they already possessed. When God makes a promise it must come to pass. Many well-meaning Christians are praying that the Lord will forgive them, when in Ephesians 1:7 we read that we already have redemption, the forgiveness of sins, through His blood.
Why is a software company based in Barcelona Spain(SCYTL) now in charge of counting our votes in the upcoming General Election on November 6th. Did the Federal Elections Commission approve of this ? (FEC) Did the Congress of the United States approve of this ?
Just settling on things and doing them because it’s convention and socially accepted will only keep you swimming in the same water as the masses. Take the chance in life and don’t be afraid of change.
Throughout the 1930s and 40s, Universal Studios released an entire catalogue of horror films such as Dracula, The Wolf Man, Frankenstein, and all of their sequels and spin offs. Widely considered among the greatest of these films is Bride of Frankenstein. Influenced by Bride of Frankenstein as well as many other monster films of the 1940s and 50s, Rocky Horror Picture Show was released in 1975 to a disastrous reception but in years that followed it became the ultimate cult film.
It's so important not just to read and understand the fine print (my mantra), but to constantly pursue knowledge about writing and publishing (while always being discriminating about the source) so you'll know how to properly evaluate the opportunities (or pitfalls) that come your way. The more you know, the better armed you will be against Dodgy and its ilk.
vague on the details, bold in the moments
The side characters are hilarious as well, especially Mimi and OK, who are amazing.
For the long and medium term too this inquiry is more important than the “disrepute” case. After all, it could involve many people who have been involved with Rangers over the years, some of whom are still keen to play an active part in the game.
Though it is relatively new to the United States, Bonal has been around since 1885. Quinquinas like Bonal are very similar to vermouth in that they are aromatized, fortified wines, usually based on white wine or mistelle--non-fermented or partially fermented grape juice with alcohol added. What makes them different is what is then added. A variety of herbs are used in both to create the unique flavor, but generally quinquinas have a significant amount of cinchona bark. Vermouths don't usually include this ingredient, and if they do, in much smaller quantities. Vermouths, on the other hand, were known for their inclusion of wormwood--"wermut" is the German word for wormwood. This distinction has become less important over the years, though some vermouths do still utilize scant amounts of wormwood in their recipes.
Try to camp at least 100 feet from water and in the case that you are camping in the back country, be sure to include a means of purifying the water that is available. For example, pack a water filter or iodine tablets. As well, when watering your horse in the back country, use established watering sites (ex. sites that wildlife has used for watering).
March 02 The Funhouse, Seattle WA
Childish Booksmart Friend and I have had a long talk, in the way that long talks between friends tend to go. You start with one idea, then drift off to another, to finally digress your way til morning.
I'm taking four classes this fall, and I love them all. They are fascinating, specialized, and give me a clear trajectory for where I will be in 10 years: overqualified, unemployed, possibly homeless. Here they are:
Contest rules are simple: Guess which movie each dialogue sample comes from and the one to get the most correct WINS! *fanfare* In the event of multiple winners, one will be chosen using random.org. This is totally based on the honor system, so for you Googlers out there... *flits fingers from my eyes to you* ...I'm watching you. Okay, not really 'cause that would be creepy... o_o
I am also entering this in the following challenge:
Kraftwerk Radio activity D
Still, we have the clips. A lot of good conversation starters from the Baldwinesque mind with a linebacker's body (and temperament). In a few of my book interviews I've talked about race as a "shrinking elephant in the room", an elephant smaller in part cause Patrice was such an enormous talent.
job for which they are meant. And
Finding Light in the Dark Dimension by Bob Furnell
Every month we usually have 3 challenges, the Bella Muse, the Bella Tres Chic and the Bella Unique.
Gorgeous, gorgeous flowers!"
Switzerland is quaint as fuck and looks like a Thomas Kinkade painting without the gauze filter. Here comes the v. excitable Nicki! Know what would be fun? HELICOPTER RIDE. IT'S ALL HELICOPTER RIDES ON THIS SHOW. Ben has been on 2 seasons of this show and has spent more time in a helicopter than a News10 TrafficAlert reporter. Anyway, Switz does look beautiful and stunning and Nicki says "I felt like we were the only 2 people in Switzerland" and I guess this is some kind of Robot Copter. We will cap this off with some mountaintop picnicking and Nicki reminds us all about 100 times that she's in love with this schlub. Yawn.
07. We Own The Night
The Chinese like to say that one’s ears tend to itch when people talk about you. If that is true, then Tan Sri Abdul Taib Mahmud’s ears could be itching like crazy over the next week.
But there is a much more dangerous form of objectification going on, than just thinking of another person as a vessel for one’s own personal pleasure. Admittedly, it’s sexual in nature. But not inherently pleasurable. It’s the form of objectification that regards women as little more than incubators for children.
1/2 small onion, finely chopped
Here are two of my own projects that didn't make it into the Holiday Cards and More Special Issue - forgive the terrible photos - I'll post better ones later!
Thank you Na'ima! Feel free to visit BD again!
I'll leave you with a new collage I just finished- one of the small ones I think of as studies or experiments. To be honest, I had no idea where this one was going, and I'm not sure if it's arrived there yet.
Are you going to post a picture of the fabulous cake you made?
Taslin cursed. "It's in her head!"
I smile. I nod. I say "thank you". I cry late at night.
We had to do some rearranging.
I hardly let the first batch cool before I cut out one roll and cut a piece to try. It was so good it "made me want to slap my granma" as my mother-in-law is fond of saying. Tender, sweet, maple-y, oooy, goooy, deliciousness!! I am ashamed to admit that I have eaten a total of three of them since taking them out of the oven around 5:30 this evening. I will be eating bread and water tomorrow to offset the calories I had today. But, oh, it was so very worth it. You really need to give these a try. Now that I know how easy they are to make, there's no stopping me now! :)
“Now, what happens on another day when Mrs. KT is running late and she gets to the classroom and remembers that she forgot to dry her hair?!? Who could really help her now?”
10:30am-10:55am- BOOKED by Daniela
Please email me at mariamindbodyhealth@gmail.com for more details.
- Judge queries invoices from a printers in Tallaght, west Dublin called “Print in Time” which purported to be for letterheads and business cards showing an address of Sean’s new office in Derrylin and says if the invoice was “genuinely dated” then it “is likely” it refers to other letterheads and cards to the ones furnished to the court. Judge also says the invoice didn’t mention compliment slips which Sean furnished to the court.
I said needs not wants. There is a big difference between the two. If it is in God’s will to begin with then the desires of our heart and prayers are granted because we are in alignment with what God had for us to begin with. Idolatry is forbidden. God is first in our life. He is above all things, routines, and activities in our lives. Be pleasing to God. If you are not pleasing God but pleasing man, now you know what scripture says and you are able to change your path and go down the right path. That also makes you accountable for your actions.
Though I’m really sure I won’t
Perhaps the worst thing about the creature was its affinity for children. Its yearn for taking children from their families who henceforth could never hope to see them again. What it did to them, reader, even I do not know, but if I did, I still would not tell you. This is certainly evidence enough for mothers far and wide adamantly refusing their children entry into the forest, it is known that in particular, the creature preyed most preferably upon girls that were reaching the time wherein childhood is but a repressed memory and womanhood a tentative cycle journey away.
Dying Seas
Heyy All :D I hope you are all enjoying the wonderful-ness of Fall..hot cider, the changing trees, and of course the upcoming HALLOWEEN!!! I finally found a little time to sit down this afternoon and create a cute little limited edition Collection of Halloween Inspired adornments :D I listed a few tonight, the rest will be up in a few days. If you happen to fancy an item you see, just email me at info@artwark.com if you want to reserve anything.
Luckily, I love ice cream, no matter what time of year it is.
We’re still young, actually. But I know we’ve been through a lot.
Besides these two things, there wasn’t too much going on. The Queens Art Museum was out there but I was alone and I think it was closed anyway. Could make a nice day trip though! I’m told that the food in the area is really good, lots of diversity. Next time I suppose….
Mothers can and do soothe or shush their children in so many different ways. I want to always be the kind of mother who soothes.
1.what religion
Ok, is this weird? I think it might be a little, but at least its not the actual garbage. That would be ultra weird. Hmmm, let me know what you think
Cool Enchanting Quotes for Her
First Edition papers ~ Spring Drop (used on top card)
"That man (woman, they, etc.) attempted (threatened) to kill me,
The reflection of God’s glory.
The Bluebells were a Scottish pop group in the 1980s. They performed jangly guitar based pop not dissimilar to their Scottish contemporaries Aztec Camera and Orange Juice. They had three Top 40 hit singles in the UK, all written by guitarist and founder member Bobby Bluebell (real name Robert Hodgens) - "I'm Falling" , "Cath" , and their biggest success "Young at Heart". The latter was co-written with Siobhan Fahey of Bananarama (and originally recorded on Bananarama's album Deep Sea Skiving) and made it to number 8 in the UK Singles Chart on its original release in 1984. The band also released one EP, The Bluebells, and one full-length album, Sisters.
into something way more than that;
d) anal fire rape
It is time consuming but I'm loving the final result and since this is a smallish blanket it doesn't seem too bad.
THAT'S NICE!
At the bar their Tesco Clubcard is scornfully declined, trembling hands reach for actual cash and a real pint is procured. It is consumed proudly. Some take notes and buy "I'm Supporting Cask" T Shirts. Some have a second pint of this strangely normal beer and pat themselves on the back - being careful not to spill any of this extremely rare beverage when doing so - it's bloody expensive after all - and some even consider switching from lout to pongy cask, just to get a mention on the roll of honour. It makes you proud to be British.
I was going to do a few more curry sauce posts, but the photos all look the same, and not very pretty to look at. But I have tried adding basics mushrooms and basics pineapple to the chicken curry I did above which was really nice. The pineapples on their own are pretty much like normal pineapple pieces, definitely worth the 17p pricetag.
I'm pretty sure we caught every lizard in the forest.
For tea, we actually got a tip-off from a local, which has always been my favourite way of finding places to eat (top tip: ask any Italian in any Italian town where the best pizza is; or same in Spain for the best tapas – always works a treat!).
I don’t have CLCRet. My rotation consists of bang the key of whatever is not on cooldown and if something procs, hit it. I forget to activate Inquisition half the time, and squeal with glee when a Selfless Healer WoG crits the tank for 37k. lol. I will never be a top dps player, and I can totally live with that.
Your rule of thumb
Although the book takes place in the 1400's,
Here are 5 tips to creating economic efficiency in your business.
Shoes: Rocket Dog
They are also looking at a list of foster children that have not been visited by a DCF investigator in the last month, to see if any match the description of the children.
9. Ray loses his composure.
(800) 243-0618 (Springfield)
Anyway, I know that there are lots of terrific programs and websites out there that help you track your food storage. Whatever works for you - use it. The big thing to remember though, is to keep a hard copy. The last thing you want is to not have access to your inventory in the event of a power failure or computer failure; particularly a long term failure.
Gracious and forgiving God, you sent your Son into the world to be an example for us, so that we might follow him fully and faithfully.
In 1929 they made their first talkies. Audiences were delighted to discover that their voices were absolutely perfect for their characters. Their first feature was the 1931 Pardon Us. In 1932, they embarked on a triumphant tour of England, where they were literally mobbed, getting their first sense of their huge success. In 1933, their short The Music Box was an Oscar for Best Live Action Comedy Short Subject. From the late 20s through the mid 30s they were one of Hollywood’s most popular comedy teams, cranking out some 70 shorts and ten features – some of which (in terms of the laughter generated) are among the most perfect comedies ever made.
The park, which had been in existence since 1898, fails to open for the 1965 season. Steeplechase Park fades to black and joins the Dodgers, Ebbets Field, the original Luna Park, and Ravenhall Baths, as one of the borough’s treasured memories.
﻿ There's a fabulous scene at the beginning of the new Harry Potter film where the intrepid friends are in a vault at Gringotts, and the treasure starts to multiply. As they struggle not to be crushed by the pulsating pile of bling, it's tempting to see it as a metaphor for the stunning financial success achieved by JK Rowling. From a typically small advance for a first novel, she's grown a multi-million pound fortune - and one which looks set to grow even further, now that she's split with her agent, cut free from her publishers and launched her own Pottermore website through which she will sell her e-books excusively.
I promise next week I will have more time and I will be able to post my favorites.
Neighbourhoods
If you haven’t tried Garrett Popcorn you are missing out! I am truly obsessed with this popcorn and it is available for purchase online in case you do not have a store in your area. The “Chicago Mix” is the best. It is a combination of cheese and caramel mixed together.
So. It's been a while since I did any regular blogging, or writing, and I've been wracking my brain trying to figure out where this summer went.
This is the gallery and some of my thoughts while creating a Carthaginian army for DBA. I used to have a blog specially for this, that´s why this gallery has tips and such. These are actually 2 DBA armies, a double Carthaginian army with all the options for use with BBDA (with an ally) or some of the more figure intensive games.
Apologies for the lack of blogging but it has been a very busy month (and a bit) at work... The good news is that I spent some of this past month in Dubai, which is certainly a very convenient location for a cigar smoker!
If you can't articulate the synopsis of your book very quickly, then the reader won't as well.
Soon I will be sure
3-4 Tbs chili powder
Normal to simply head nods and points within the past month- this is the healing process
My newest pillow is a beautiful coral pink one that sits with the grey striped ones on the bed. I ordered the fabric from Spoonflower and had it custom made with piping. I love the color and how it ties with the "For Like Ever" print in the room.
What a fun but exhausting day. Our church held it’s first annual car show and what a turn out! And the boys had a blast.
At this point I would normally start talking about the time we have left here and how it doesn’t seem like much, but that is putting an expectation on the next two days–assuming they are going to fly by. If that happens, I won’t appreciate them to their fullest potential. Therefore, I’ll end this quicky spring break update blog by saying, I am really enjoying the time off school, even if I’m staying at my parents’ house. Even if I’m sleeping on the couch and I feel like I have to fold the blankets when I wake up in the morning. Even if I have no idea where anything is and being here makes me antsy about adulthood. It’s a “day at a time” process and I am going to enjoy each day of the journey.
Well, I've been MIA for a few weeks now... not really eventful weeks but had some interesting stuff happen while I was away from blogland...
Fine, you’re right, I don’t have one. But that’s because mom and dad won’t let me, not because I don’t want one.
Apparently they love the taste of salt, and Phil’s sweaty limbs appear to be the equivalent of a five-star gourmet meal.
I read an interview with Morrison last year where the interlocutor, attempting both levity and sanity, pointed out that the superhero look, shorts and tights, was still not popular. But he was wrong: admittedly, it’s only girls wearing them for now, but I see girls in tights or leggings with denim shorts on top ALL THE TIME.
So imagine how absolutely thrilled I am about our Thanksgiving plans. Yes, folks, we've decided to screw the turkey (which I never really liked very much in the first place -- it's always too dry) and are doing something Much More Interesting: Ramen from scratch. This includes the broth, the noodles and all of the toppings (hello, runny egg cooking lesson).
I believe it was old color-blind Al Sharpton who put Plan B into circulation. That was after George Zimmerman’s father, Robert, notified the media on March 20 that his son is not white.
"Pooling together: IP as hero or villain?
Love I’ve discovered
The foliage we see while traveling is out of dreams. There are greens of every shade, shapes of every size, and flowers with rainbow mixtures of colors. All mingled and growing together, on top, around, and below. Providing homes to insects, reptiles, and birds. Amazing. As we travel to unseen areas, just like shop vendors rolling up their metal doors for a new day, we are open to new experience, colors, and aromas. Ready to embrace diversity, both subtle and extreme.
hugger. Oh, OK, if I’m honest – I’d get her to make me some of her wonderful
No thanks. Stay at home Mr C. Send Cheryl Cole instead.
Therefore, I highly suggest this book for the reader who either wants to tackle it as a daily devotional or the reader who needs to focus on a particular devotional.
Every man should have his own boundaries of how far he is willing to go to get a woman he wants.
Acquire and pack travel food--snacks, etc, ice chest.
Don’t be greedy! Due to high demand we will only allow four tickets per person.
As to “illegal reasons” to access records, you can also think of these as the non-permissible reasons. For example, a PI can’t access a driver’s history to find that person’s residence so the PI can stalk, intimidate or harass that person. Those are obviously non-permissible reasons and the PI could end up answering to federal charges for violating the DPPA and state charges for participating in stalking. Similarly, a PI cannot obtain other records that are governed by permissible reasons (such as police records, water district records, fire district records) for personal use (for example, to solicit clients for himself or for a lawyer, or to resale the information for profit).
we set a special bed for taylor.
Miss you tons Mom, love you even more.
1) My collection of pocketbooks that keep increasing every payday. I never really have the time to read them all, and even if I did try I keep losing track of which page or chapter I’m supposed to continue from. Dog-earring pages could only do so much.
Granted, in the beginning when every night for 4 hours or more he was fussy and crying it may not have seemed like it was going all that fast but looking back at how far we have come in such a short period of time just blows my mind! This little man who only came into our lives a mere 6 months ago is growing into this little boy who is fun and exciting and starting to develop his own little personality! LOVE IT.
Tell your mom to throw those damned shoes away. I had a pair of sketchers and over the course of a couple of years I fell more than I ever have in my whole life. I finally fell off them and fractured my foot. I stopped wearing them and haven't fallen since. I know this sounds like I'm a nut case but some are designed with the sole being very narrow through the arch, for me this cause some sort of balance issue. Yikes! Should anyone ever take advice from me???
sticky with birth
Jesus Redondo was born 8th August 1934 in Valladolid, Spain. His father was a teacher in Cubillas de Santa Maria, and he inherited a love of drawing, literature and other arts.
To break this spell - I'll take your hat, your hair looks swell
Live in New York City once, but leave before it makes you hard. Live in Northern California once, but leave before it makes you soft. Travel.
But I forgive him their loss
Hi everyone, I have had a few people express concerns that I hadn't posted in a while so I thought I should leave a quick note. All is well, however, computer problems, having to be out of town for a while and family obligations have kept me out of my craft room for almost 3 weeks (yikes!). I hope to start creating and posting again soon.
Oh, yes. Those poor monkeys, their ever-changing provenance and authorship and hypotheses and numbers and findings, making the rounds like some terrible virus, infecting even my pleasant time at a Colorado water park with my children, my friend, and her children. Gah.
Unlike the Arab Spring the Occupy Movement met a rather demeaning response of apathy. The sigh of cynicism from the observers was heard almost in unison with the shouts on the ground. The extreme violence which met protestors in Libya, Syria, Egypt and many more, certainly validated their concerns, tragically in real time, with pressure mounting to a greater extent every day (than any uprising in the West), largely coming from the international community; in the modern age they are unable to ignore it. Occupy is an interesting attempt to defy the outcomes of capitalism but a comparison cannot be made with sincerity to give respect and due justice to the cause across the Arab World.
Hello Fellow Bloggers
So yeah, worst decision so far was to participate in will-call. Early delivery had 1 person in line, purchase tickets the day of had 10 people in line, will-call has, from my position in line about 500-1000 people ahead of me, more than that now behind me. Apparently Blogger doesn't like to upload iPhone pics so expect them later.
Location: Argyle Fine Art, 1559 Barrington Street, Halifax
My advice to anyone selling on Ebay is to insist on cash only.
The reply was unexpected. ‘I bought it at auction. It was Goering’s.’
More specifically, would/could we ever conceive of an author re-writing a classic? Including keeping the original title?
1/2 pound fresh goat cheese brought to room temperature
So my strong preference would be for us to figure out ways that we can continue to provide help across the board. But I’m operating within some political constraints here, because whatever I do has to go through the House of Representatives.
You can do this.
2 Cups Whole Wheat Flour (If you don’t have on hand you can always use all-purpose flour, you just will loose the whole wheat nutrients)
When we arrive at the playground at Mad’s school, she was tooling around on the John Deere tricycle. This amazes me, of course, because she doesn’t care to ride on the multiple wheeled vehicles she actually owns. Context, I guess. When Mad saw Lynnette and I, she didn’t park the bike. She told us to watch her motor around on the sidewalk bordering the sandbox. After I snapped a few pictures I told her it was time to go. She said she wasn’t ready to go. I told her she could stay. She got off the bike. I’m trying to pad my “psychological win” stats because in a few years, she’s going to go off and decimate me. I am sure of this.
Take away the cars, road, trees, and light poles and radio tower, and add a second sun, you'd have Tatooine. Hmm...it looked more yellow sky in real life. Regardless...
They are rungs in your ladder. Use them!
*Images: Hampton Art; Hero Arts Sending Smiles
Cydia
More or less, the reason we watch or ignore a flick like this is based on whether or not it gives us what we want. Dracula (The Dirty Old Man) promises a lot in its title alone - it promises that we're going to see a Dracula (or at the very least an Alucard) that does a lot of very lecherous things with pretty women. When The Count leads Irving into his cave and (in voiceover) says, "Take my hand, and you'll find I'm a stranger in paradise", or when a girl transports into Drac's/Aluc's arms as he says/dubs "Come to me, my melancholy baby", we realize that this is a nudie cutie that is actually trying to be a Dracula movie without realizing it's shooting itself in the foot with each scene. Or at least stabbing itself with a wooden stake.
Have you worked this one out yet? Mexican ... unusual in their unexplained popularity and taste respectively ... odd ... Mexican Ordinarys! But I know you want MOre!!
Burns Therapeutics – Products under Development by Companies 19
I organized a group trip to the monthly Tri-State Antique Market. As I was making introductions, I realized that the group was dominated by style bloggers (me, Tamia, Goose, and Londyn). I promised to take them to my favorite, top-secret, $1 jewelry stall. After much sweaty slogging through the heat, I didn’t find my usual vendor, but another operator had boxes of $1 jewelry for us to paw through. We tore it up.
Drinkwell Pet Fountains have presented a fine alternative for a matter dealing with individuals whom own numerous animals. When you have several dogs, specially several big pet dogs, there will not be actually almost any choices in regards to dog water functions. Presently that’s altered using the advance of the particular Drinkwell 360 dog water fountain.
Source: socialbarrel
It was quite a day. Actually, quite a week. School was coming to an end and summer was just around the corner. I had plans to be helping out at the coffee shop and just like every year my birthday was the same weekend as the strawberry festival. And this year to add to the fun Matt's company planned a company party at the wings and waves water park on my actual birthday. (Yes, I think they did that on purpose) So, my big 3-0 day was packed. Just the way I like it. :) The day was starting with me at the coffee shop. The Strawberry Fest was in full swing and it was a great day at the shop! At about noon I hit the road and headed home to meet the family so we could make our way to the water park. We felt quite privileged to have our party there considering it wasn't opening to the public until the next day.
There is so much more!
On the other hand, there is Leviathon, 2007, a skeletal whale constructed with such wit and intelligence that it makes Maurizo Cattalan’s Felix look like a parlor trick for millionaires. Initially, it looks like any skeleton you would find at the La Brea Tarpits or in a natural history museum. The whale’s back is arched, its serpentine mouth moves forward as if to strike, a posture part drama and part comedy. Then the typical Hawkinson transformation occurs, and you realize that something more is at work, like the pop top moving on his Coke Clock, 1996. The spinal column of the fish, you find, are people rowing and its ribs the oars. Then, in a hilarious gesture, the skull itself is a man bent over looking between its legs, its proud brow of the whale nothing more than an ass.
That shaw'd the dead in their last dresses;
When I first started trolling online and learning the ins and outs of marketing an insurance business online, I used to see blogs promoting a guest blogger and think, “Wow! I wonder how that person became a guest blogger?” But, guess what? I’ve discovered it is MUCH easier than it seems. All I did was send a private message to the blog owners requesting the ability to become a guest blogger and attach a copy of my super helpful article and, viola! I was given the spot.
written in the early 60's by Dymphna Cusack
As the demand driven system kicks into high gear the government has initiated an inquiry into rural and regional education which will focus on secondary school completion and access and participation in tertiary education. The demand driven system poses particular challenges for regional universities given the issues for access and participation. Most tertiary students tend in the first instance to migrate to cities to attend metropolitan universities. The need for regional universities to build areas of particular strength, to devise programmes that respond to local and regional socio-economic and skilling needs and the need for students to find support to attend regional universities have all been key to discussions. The review will also look at funding considering how the Structural Adjustment Fund can assist the regional universities and the creation of income contingent funding for students to attend regional universities.
Not if I can help it. I shuffle off from the back of the hall just as the delegates are going to have a vote on what will be the Protected Bird of Betazoid, the Woody Wood Pigeon, or the Fanta Orangebird.
I still believe there are many opportunities for online skeptic projects that have not yet been built. In the past on this blog I have successfully exhorted skeptics to get involved online in one way or another. Most notably Susan Gerbic has created an entire blog and Wikipedia project based around the ideas I originally championed here. There are others too.
* When we’re introduced to the character Hephaestus I wondered if you were influenced by classics such as Frankenstein monster and Greek mythology?
Google Drive 1.0 - Google Drive-keep everything, share anything. Google Drive is everywhere you are—on the web, in your home, at the office and on the go. So wherever you are, your stuff is just…there. Ready to go, ready to share.
So there she is, the big 1-0, and I am SO beyond psyched to finally, officially shout to the world that
Before Christmas, I attended some enjoyable literary events. At the end of November John and I drove on a misty afternoon into Derbyshire to the very nice launch of Insignificant Gestures, a debut collection of short stories by Jo Cannon - stories strikingly informed by her profession as a GP. There she is, below, signing copies of her book.
Ok, funny into going on. James Franco is a lot more attractive than Alec Baldwin that's for sure.
Some customers in Durango seem intent on encouraging the unique and special places we have here to regress to the mean. Coors Light and vodka-Red Bulls for all.
Sound Editing
I decided that for Thanksgiving morning every year from here on out, we would start our day with Thanksgiving waffles. And it was very convenient for me that her school gave each kid a copy of the recipe! :-)
29 So we boiled my son, and did eat him: and I said unto her on the next day, Give thy son, that we may eat him: and she hath hid her son.
The ontological argument from reason
This sounds fine in theory but how do you tell a real Defacto partner from a housemate or a more casual kind of relationship when your prime witness is dead ?
Past tense: Lay
as I thought it would be, to enter ten snail mail entries a day that is. Like I've mentioned before, for this year I am trying to up my game a bit in regards to entering snail mail sweepstakes and figured I would enter at least ten snail mail sweeps each day when the mail went out, except for National Holidays of course.
Firstly, we should congratulate the Election Commission for making a treasure trove of data available. All the municipal election results can be found here. Parliamentary election results are here (with centre level details here). In December 2008, Syeed Ahamed and I wrote a series of articles demanding that these data are made available in real time (see here).
What about you? Wha menu do you have for Thanksgiving?
From my perspective, soul contracts take into account the commitment, obligation or oaths we make on a soul level, prior to incarnation.
So Prahlāda Mahārāja says, iti puṁsārpitā viṣṇau bhaktiś cen nava-lakṣaṇā. All these items means hearing. Hearing about Viṣṇu, chanting about Kṛṣṇa, giving everything to Viṣṇu, offering prayers to Viṣṇu, offering arcana, temple worship, Viṣṇu. In this way Prahlāda Mahārāja summarizes that “Anyone who is doing like this, everything about Viṣṇu…” iti puṁsārpitā viṣṇau bhaktiś cen nava-lakṣaṇā, “this nine kinds of different devotional services,” kriyeta bhagavatay addhā, “directly to the Supreme Personality of Godhead,” tan manye ‘dhītam uttamam, “I think he is the best learned man in the world. He is the most learned.” Tan manye ‘dhītam. “He has studied everything very nicely.” Actually, that is the fact. Jñāna, knowledge Knowledge means to know Kṛṣṇa, God, and the Vedic injunction is, yasmin vijñāte sarvam evaṁ vijñātaṁ bhavanti. If you understand the Supreme Lord, then you understand everything. You haven’t got to study differently different subject matters. Just like we sometimes talk of science, of astronomy, economics, politics. We talk sometimes. But we are not going to, or we didn’t study all the subject matter separately. But in course of our studying Kṛṣṇa consciousness, we know something of everything. So Prahlāda Mahārāja says, tan manye adhītam uttamam: “One who is engaged in these nine kinds of devotional services directly…” So Prahlāda Mahārāja recommends, kriyeta bhagavaty addhā tan manye ‘dhītam uttamam.
What obstacles did you encounter on your path to university?
I can be a political junky at times. Though its a long time since I was a party member, (and briefly, ward treasurer!), that's more because of my artistic take on the world - like the most politically astute Marx, i.e. Groucho, I wouldn't join a club that would have me as a member. I'm temperamentally unsuited to following party lines; even if most of those point left. I cheered wildly when the coalition ditched the identity card plans for instance; yet stubbornly put my cross in the Labour box at the general election because I never had any illusions which side the coalition was going to be on.
Break through and sink down
Revit rua retat tak grivam
Because it’s cold outside.
So, the one thing I anticipated/dreaded about the Maui trip was the zipline. I’m afraid of heights, and I’m not too keen on dangling from cables with a harness wedged up my….never mind. Oh, the questions ran through my mind: What if the cable breaks? What if the harness isn’t hooked up right? What good is the helmet going to do if I fall?
I wasn’t led to the transition room, but a small exam room. There wasn’t room for the stroller, so I left it outside and carried Anna in. Dr. Nodurft entered the room with us and another doctor followed behind us. The room seemed to be filled by the exam table and I remember how white the paper liner looked on the table. Did I say the room was small? That feeling of slow motion was starting again and I had a bad feeling. There couldn’t possibly be anything wrong with Jeff. Don’t doctors give you bad news in their private office, or in a family waiting room…or in a private, small exam room…
still is.
Fresh from their appearance in our list of great EPs from 2011, Brooklyn based Conveyor are already looking ahead and planning on grabbing 2012 by the scruff of the neck and making it their bitch.
This very same scenario made me think and reflect. We too in life, at some point in time, experience heat and dryness caused by our troubles and problems in life. Sickness, financial lack, relationship problems, frustrations, loneliness and hopelessness to mention a few. These situations burns us and drains our strength but our hearts are filled with that intense desire that they will soon end. We long for solutions and ways that we can rid of them all.
I was a closer. When I already had a party of 11 and a party of 8 and two other tables...we just got sat with two more tables and I was told that a specific table had requested me. I went over, did my thing...people got wine and drinks...got their salads/soup out quickly, cleared it, entrees went down perfectly. They commented specifically that everything was perfect (which NEVER happens for them!). I had my manager run out some A1 sauce/dressing for them. Everything still seemed great. They got another bottle of wine (for which I even got a decanter the first time) and round 2 drinks. Somewhere after this, I guess they lacked some water at some point and one of the guys decided to get a drink for himself at the bar. Later on he got another drink for himself while I was standing there AT THE TABLE. I assumed he had a reason for doing this. Like...he's an alcoholic (drink 4 btw). Boxed up food, brought them their free pastas (it's a special/promotion thing), cleared the table.... Check had been dropped earlier.
To know you’d have a baby that would need be clothed and fed.
Tamora Pierce’s Tortall books.
1 chopped apple (peeled and cored)
Beat in water (or broth), and then chopped parsley.
with moth holes
What the commission cannot do though is conceal the evidence. Even though references to the work have disappeared from the commission's own website, the trail of papers can still be found on elsewhere the internet, leaving Vassalos in the awkward position of trying to play down the importance of his own papers.
